{"post-77426": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515206230000", "message": "Far from civilization, exists a castle, several stories tall tucked deep into the mountains. The gray stone face is covered in lichen and vines that creep up along it. It has no walls, although the footprint is sprawling, accented with narrow, slatted windows fastened with heavy oaken shutters. Camping anywhere they can inhabit, grotesques squat, their twisted, ugly faces snarling at the world beyond, as if trying to keep it at bay. No, for it was no monsters they sought to keep out, but people. Humans who might innocently wander into this seemingly abandoned structure. For deep within through the veins of its hallways, the pooling red blood of its carpet, lurked the beating heart. The Lord Volkh himself.\u00a0The only living souls that dared venture into the building were two dire wolves and a slew of verminous rodents. Rats lurked where they could, bats similarly clinging to any available surface in some of the lower rooms. Yet the castle had rooms to spare.\u00a0A vampire dwelled in these walls, though few knew it, and even fewer were willing to visit such a remote destination. Indeed, not only was the castle deadly to the uninitiated, it was remote. Several days, perhaps even a week through treacherous terrain was what it took to arrive and it would be unlikely indeed for anyone to stumble upon it. Even so, stranger things had happened. Indeed, it seemed flight would be the most efficient way to reach it, and it was no wonder how the Lord left it.\u00a0The Castle has many, many traps. Some obvious, others less so, and the guardians that roamed within made it a dangerous prospect indeed to seek it out. But if one were brave or foolhardy enough, perhaps once could meet face-to-face with the Lord Volkh.\u00a0(Click for Music, Courtesy of Bucky)", "link_list": ["https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M1OwZw4HRIw"], "image_list": ["https://i.imgur.com/8zB25I9.jpg"], "html": "Far from civilization, exists a castle, several stories tall tucked deep into the mountains. The gray stone face is covered in lichen and vines that creep up along it. It has no walls, although the footprint is sprawling, accented with narrow, slatted windows fastened with heavy oaken shutters. Camping anywhere they can inhabit, grotesques squat, their twisted, ugly faces snarling at the world beyond, as if trying to keep it at bay. No, for it was no monsters they sought to keep out, but people. Humans who might innocently wander into this seemingly abandoned structure. For deep within through the veins of its hallways, the pooling red blood of its carpet, lurked the beating heart. The Lord Volkh himself.\u00a0"}, "post-77448": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515275372000", "message": "One small body, driven neither by bravery or foolishness, decided that it would make it up to that castle.Dressed in little more than a heavy cloak, they walked, and walked, and walked for hours on end, never stopping until nightfall, where they would collapse in a heap until sunrise. By all means, they should have perished.Still, they pushed on.Days passed until the tiny stranger reached the entrance of the castle, steps uneven, body wavering as though from a night of drinking. Though they were brought to their knees at the front, the fatigue brought them down for just a moment. Soon, they were stumbling into the castle, oblivious to the dangers around them.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "One small body, driven neither by bravery or foolishness, decided that it would make it up to that castle."}, "post-77456": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515279463000", "message": "The interior of the castle was cool. Unnaturally so, although such a thing might be a relief to one who had walked so far. The polished, smooth marble stone beneath her knees was cool to the touch and smooth, stretching out for the entire entryway. Sunlight poured into the building, illuminating several swirling galaxies of dust. Cobwebs draped like gossamer shrouds over every piece of furniture, be it upholstered leather chairs made of fine oak, or towering candelabras made from blackened iron. One might notice any of that first...or perhaps they might notice the silence. So silent as it let one hear their own heartbeat. An unnerving lack of sound that seemed to absorb merriment or even one's thoughts. The illusion was shattered, however, as the doors swung inwards, seemingly on their own and closed with a cacophonous thud. Darkness enveloped the room. So absolute as to hide what even could be before a normal human's eyes. Alone in the dark of Castle Volkh the doors sealed themselves.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The interior of the castle was cool. Unnaturally so, although such a thing might be a relief to one who had walked so far. The polished, smooth marble stone beneath her knees was cool to the touch and smooth, stretching out for the entire entryway. Sunlight poured into the building, illuminating several swirling galaxies of dust. Cobwebs draped like gossamer shrouds over every piece of furniture, be it upholstered leather chairs made of fine oak, or towering candelabras made from blackened iron. "}, "post-77463": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515284656000", "message": "The figure was all but too weary to jump as the doors closed, whipping around only to darkness. Their raspy breathing was the only thing audible within the room. The hood dropped from the small stranger's head, revealing someone who was not expected to of made it up the mountain.She was scarcely more than a girl, though she wasn't yet a woman. So thin from days of walking and little to eat, her figure betrayed her age, as did the roundness of her face. Even as young as she seemed, the traveler was rough: she was filthy head to toe, and when the cloak parted at the front, a plethora of scratches adorning her legs and arms were apparent. She wore only a blouse on her person, which was ripped and tattered. Atop her head, right above her temples, were two bulbous, inflamed bumps that seemed to be growing by the second.This was the one who had trekked up the mountain, risking life and limb, to get to the castle.\"Who... who's there!?\" she croaked, voice hoarse from the dry air. It quivered, as did her tiny, frail body. She put a hand atop the dagger at her hip.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The figure was all but too weary to jump as the doors closed, whipping around only to darkness. Their raspy breathing was the only thing audible within the room. The hood dropped from the small stranger's head, revealing someone who was not expected to of made it up the mountain."}, "post-77465": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515286226000", "message": "The only answer Natasa Waltine  got was the sound of her own echo. The darkness seemed suffocating, like a thousand blankets smothering one in a eerily cold embrace. For a moment it seemed as if the castle might consume her. As if it were a living being, an entity that preyed upon foolish travelers. Then a voice: Smooth and cold as the marble she stood upon. \"Draw your weapon in my Castle, and you will see what becomes of those with the desire to battle.\" it spoke \"I bid you restrain yourself.\" it was difficult to tell where, in the darkness, the voice may have originated. It could have been right behind her, having slammed the door. Or perhaps it was before her? Peering down upon her? Then, right as her ear: \"I will give you one chance. I suggest you take it.\" the door rumbled, creaking on its hinged as it opened one just a crack. Enough for a slip of a girl to escape. Even with the smallest sliver of light it provided the source of the voice had yet to be illuminated however, looking closely one might make out the fainest shadow of a figure in the darkness, far from the sunlight.\u00a0\"Leave here, and do not seek to return.\"", "link_list": ["/user/2760"], "image_list": [], "html": "The only answer "}, "post-77466": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515287975000", "message": "The young girl felt all the hairs rise on the back of her neck when the voice spoke so close to her. Though her hand dropped from the weapon, though every cell in her body screamed to run, her feet felt as though they were glued to the ground. Her breathing quickened at such a pace that the dry air set her lungs on fire. She saw the door. She saw the way out. She saw a chance. Run, r-Pain oozed from her forehead, causing her to inhale sharply. Visions danced behind her eyes. No, no-\"No,\" she hissed. Even though her whole body shuddered with pain and sheer terror alone put a lump in her throat, causing her to sob and wet her face with tears and snot, even though she felt death was certain in this moment, somewhere, somehow, she found the will to whip around to face the voice. \"I need your help!\" she cried, using all the strength she had left to push the words through her mouth into the crisp air. \"I won't... won't l-leave until I get it!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The young girl felt all the hairs rise on the back of her neck when the voice spoke so close to her. Though her hand dropped from the weapon, though every cell in her body screamed to run, her feet felt as though they were glued to the ground. Her breathing quickened at such a pace that the dry air set her lungs on fire. She saw the door. She saw the way out. She saw a chance. Run, r-"}, "post-77467": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515288887000", "message": "As she turned to face the darkened figure it was silent in the face of her protests. Between them was silence and as she stared at it it began its approach, stopping just shy of a foot from her. BOOMDarkness enveloped them once again. The sliver of light and her only hope of escape had been shut out once more by the door, and the two of them were left in complete isolation. She had given up her chance at escape it had seemed, and the figure loomed menacingly above her. Then, one by one, flames flickered to life atop the partially-melted candles of the candelabras and a chandelier above. One by one they ignited seemingly on their own as they revealed whom she spoke to.\u00a0\"You're so certain of your cause, young one, but do you have the courage to stay your course?\" The man whom the candlelight revealed stood with a glass of wine in-hand, although it was thicker, more viscous than any red poured from a bottle. \"I have given you the kindness of escape yet you remain.\" he continued, the sudden current of cold air clearing some of the dust from the marble floor, revealing a dimly-lit reflection of her- and a floating glass of wine that seemed to swirl itself in the air.\u00a0\"So what do you believe you need my help for?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As she turned to face the darkened figure it was silent in the face of her protests. Between them was silence and as she stared at it it began its approach, stopping just shy of a foot from her. "}, "post-77531": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515351641000", "message": "Ice encased the girl's bones as she found herself staring the man in the face. She felt her breath catch, felt her sobbing pause. Her lips were agape at the massive shadow before her, making her knees quiver. The blood drained from her cheeks, but she didn't look away. Something was drawing her into those eyes, almost as much as it was telling her to run.\"I need your... your help, because...\" Her hand tightened on the shoulder of her cloak, and her expression became determined. She threw the cloth away from her, turning her back to him as she did. \"I believe this is your handiwork.\"The back of her shirt had been ripped away almost entirely, and upon her bare skin, between the second and third rib, there was a groove deep enough to reach her heart and thin enough to slip a blade between. The wound glowed gently, deep and blue in color, with flames licking the edges of her skin and blackening it. Cracks spiraled across her back from the injury, only growing with time.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ice encased the girl's bones as she found herself staring the man in the face. She felt her breath catch, felt her sobbing pause. Her lips were agape at the massive shadow before her, making her knees quiver. The blood drained from her cheeks, but she didn't look away. Something was drawing her into those eyes, almost as much as it was telling her to run."}, "post-77532": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515352702000", "message": "At first it seemed the girl might be too paralyzed to answer him. A pity. Yet, something inside her sparked; courage? Or desperation? She whipped off her cloak, turning away from him to reveal... The Lord's eyes narrow at the sight of her wound. Black and soulless, they took in every detail. This wound...the idea that such a thing was impossible danced in his mind for a moment, but he brushed it away like cobwebs. The word \"Impossible\" had died when he did. No, this was certainly his doing. To think, his former apprentice would have the gall to get back up after he himself put him down.\u00a0\"You seem to be laboring under the impression that this is my concern.\" the voice, as devoid of compassion as his castle was of warmth. \"You have come further than most and, I suspect, survived more than most. That may warrant...consideration. If you come to be in search of retribution you are welcome to try, but if you are here for my aid, perhaps you could have saved yourself the trouble. Or perhaps you've merely come to offer your failing body? A young woman with such a curse must have a rather curious flavor.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "At first it seemed the girl might be too paralyzed to answer him. A pity. Yet, something inside her sparked; courage? Or desperation? She whipped off her cloak, turning away from him to reveal... The Lord's eyes narrow at the sight of her wound. Black and soulless, they took in every detail. This wound...the idea that such a thing was impossible danced in his mind for a moment, but he brushed it away like cobwebs. The word \"Impossible\" had died when he did. No, this was certainly "}, "post-77535": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515355708000", "message": "The girl turned very, very slowly to look up at him, her eyes large and wide, like a young kitten in the face of a starving dog. She mouthed her protests softly, hands grasping her arms, seeking false comfort in herself. She backed away from him, shaking her head.\"No, that's not... I came all this way, I...\" She squeezed her eyes tightly, spittle flying through her gritted teeth as she hissed. Cracks spiraled over her shoulder from the wound, dancing up her neck. \"Everyone is dead now. Even if I left...\"A cry like a wounded animal left her lips. One of the lumps on her forehead split the skin, splattering blood onto the ground as it released a pointed horn to curl about her head. The flames grew up her neck, into her throat, distorting her voice into something too demonic for the little girl to conjure herself, a voice that was all too familiar to the man before her.\"I did not come here for that answer!\" she cried, retrieving the steps she had taken away from the living shadow of a man before her. No fear and no desperation leaked from the girl now, only anger! \"There are many more of me that he left behind and there will be more yet. Every day I hear his whispers grow louder in my mind and they will ravish everything until there is nothing left.\" Her hand reached out to grab his lapels, flames consuming her arm, magic fueling her with a strength she did not have herself.\"I need the strength to right this wrong. If you won't help me...\"All at once, the flames perished, leaving only a terrified girl, hopeless, but determined still. \"Then I will die, either by your hands, or his.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl turned very, very slowly to look up at him, her eyes large and wide, like a young kitten in the face of a starving dog. She mouthed her protests softly, hands grasping her arms, seeking false comfort in herself. She backed away from him, shaking her head."}, "post-77539": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515358395000", "message": "There, writhing before him, the twisted soul of a young girl struggled against the demonic taint that ran through her body like fire. His eyes were drawn to the blood that splattered across the marble floor, pooling there wasted. Then she was upon him. He did not shy from her attempt to grab him, though she found that he barely budged, despite the air filling with the acrid smell of burnt velvet. He stared down upon her, his eyes like blackened glass as she episode passed, and she began to regain what little sense of mortality she had claim to. \"That corpse is no more my apprentice, as I am its master.\" for a moment he was silent and it seemed if that would be that. That he would cast her out or feast on her right there. \"If you seek to obligate me with its actions I will tell you just this: I already killed him. Now it is humanity's turn to do it again.\" Then, his hand lifted, cupping the side of her face and travelling to the nape of her neck to grip not tightly, but firmly. \"However...I suppose it would be remiss for me to send such a tender young guest out to become the very monster he's become. I feel no guilt for your current state, nor responsibility for his. I do, however, see opportunity for the both of us. I'm in need of a mortal. These long-bottled \"vintages\" are hardly as fulfilling as warm, fresh blood. Perhaps in serving me, you will find what training you seek.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There, writhing before him, the twisted soul of a young girl struggled against the demonic taint that ran through her body like fire. His eyes were drawn to the blood that splattered across the marble floor, pooling there wasted. Then she was upon him. He did not shy from her attempt to grab him, though she found that he barely budged, despite the air filling with the acrid smell of burnt velvet. He stared down upon her, his eyes like blackened glass as she episode passed, and she began to regain what little sense of mortality she had claim to. "}, "post-77541": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515359217000", "message": "She felt her skin crawl where he touched it. Do not move, she told herself. You committed to this since you started climbing this mountain.\"Then... so be it.\"There is no turning back now.\"I am yours.\"But one day you will burn at my feet, as will your wretched servant.Her thoughts gave her the courage to keep the monster's gaze and stand before him, foolishly, bravely, and with the fuel of rage behind it all. She would learn from him, grow stronger, and soon all that would haunt her would die.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She felt her skin crawl where he touched it. "}, "post-77561": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515363852000", "message": "Accepting the deal placed before her was no mere exchanging of words. It was her life. Her very well being was presented to him. If she fled no doubt she would perish out there in the mountains or, worse yet, succumb to the infection that threatened to steal her last shreds of humanity. Staying with him, however, was no sure cure to the affliction that ailed her. Even now the cold closed in, the gentle breeze that had dusted over the floor bringing an unprecedented chill as he leaned in closer, holding the nape of her neck. Nearing her exposed, tender throat his lips parted, revealing wickedly long incisors. The room around them stilled. The current of air halted, leaving nothing but the hollow cold and overwhelming silence that had existed when she'd first entered. The sound of her heart pounded in his ears, his mind. It drove him mad as it echoed in his silent chest.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Accepting the deal placed before her was no mere exchanging of words. It was her life. Her very well being was presented to him. If she fled no doubt she would perish out there in the mountains or, worse yet, succumb to the infection that threatened to steal her last shreds of humanity. Staying with him, however, was no sure cure to the affliction that ailed her. Even now the cold closed in, the gentle breeze that had dusted over the floor bringing an unprecedented chill as he leaned in closer, holding the nape of her neck. "}, "post-77563": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515364913000", "message": "The girl's hands clenched when his maw reached her throat. She turned her eyes toward the ceiling and tried to steel herself for the pain. Trembling, she closed her eyes, tried to force the sound of her own heart out of her mind. The frigid air coming from the beast before her stiffened her body.It's going to be over soon, it's going to be over soon, she repeated to herself.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl's hands clenched when his maw reached her throat. She turned her eyes toward the ceiling and tried to steel herself for the pain. Trembling, she closed her eyes, tried to force the sound of her own heart out of her mind. The frigid air coming from the beast before her stiffened her body."}, "post-77564": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515365607000", "message": "Then, all at once, the presence was gone. Lord Volkh released her, standing once more to his full height without so much as a nibble. \"My, you certainly are...interesting.\" he told her, and for just a moment he sounded almost entertained. Stepping away from her he picked up a candelabra that had sat collecting dust on a tarnished oaken table for decades. Picking off a few stray cobwebs he began walking to the far door deeper into the castle. \"I will see what food I have left from the days that mortals dwelled here. You would be best suited to start your work in the entryway, girl. \"Once you are fed enough to work, I expect this place to be thoroughly cleaned.\" Reaching out he put a hand on the door, pushing it open to reveal darkness although small candles began to ignite themselves, revealing a long hallway within. \"I have rules about staying here. During the night we will begin your studies, and during the day you are expected to clean and suit my needs. Are we understood? You shall have your own room.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Then, all at once, the presence was gone. Lord Volkh released her, standing once more to his full height without so much as a nibble. "}, "post-77567": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515366592000", "message": "That was the feather that broke the camel's back. All the exhaustion, the hunger, confusion, and fear, it hit her all at once. She swooned in place, brow furrowed.\"What?\" she whispered, right before blacking out completely.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "That was the feather that broke the camel's back. All the exhaustion, the hunger, confusion, and fear, it hit her all at once. She swooned in place, brow furrowed."}, "post-77573": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515371561000", "message": "Well, he tended to have that affect on women. Before she'd fallen far he was suddenly beside her, catching her as if she were weightless. Stooping slightly he placed a hand at the crook of her knees, picking her up effortlessly. Well, it seemed introductions would have to wait. Turning to leave, he hesitated at the sight of the blood spatter on the ground. The results of her transformation. Then, tearing his eyes away he stepped through the doorway to the hallway. However long it took her to rejoin them in the land of the living (Or as close as they came), she would awaken to a dimly lit room. A large bed with plush, crimson bedding, oaken bedposts looking like onyx obelisks that speared upwards into the air to suspend a delicate gossamer black silk that draped over the canopy down to the thick, dusty carpeting. In a vase nearby sat several roses, freshly picked. It was impossible to tell whether it was night or day, as every window had been tightly secured. The most surprising detail she might notice would be that she wore not the rags she'd entered in, but silk nightwear that, while not a perfect fit, was almost certainly close enough to be more comfortable than the torn rags and cloak from before. Indeed, that might be the most surprising thing she discovered since she'd awaken. As something shuffled by the darkened doorway, that might very well have been delegated to second most surprising discovery. The mystery creature was shadowed, two yellow dots of light its menacing eyes as it prowled closer, into the light. It was a wolf, that was for certain, but its similarities were outweighed by its sheer size. As tall as her, it gazed down at the visitor, its nose flaring as it took her in. A dire wolf, for those who had had the misfortune of meeting them. However, this one seemed remarkably tame. Eyeing her for a moment it seemed satisfied, turning away and trotting to the door only to glance back over its shoulder impatiently.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Well, he tended to have that affect on women. Before she'd fallen far he was suddenly beside her, catching her as if she were weightless. Stooping slightly he placed a hand at the crook of her knees, picking her up effortlessly. Well, it seemed introductions would have to wait. Turning to leave, he hesitated at the sight of the blood spatter on the ground. The results of her transformation. Then, tearing his eyes away he stepped through the doorway to the hallway. "}, "post-77576": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515373606000", "message": "The nightmares that swirled in the girl's head had her in a troubled fit as she slept. She woke with a start, covered with a layer of sweat, which, she discovered, is not all she was covered in.Looking down, she placed a hand on her stomach, feeling the thin, smooth fabric under her fingers. Confusion clouded her mind as she then glanced around the room, piecing together slowly the events that brought her here. She grasped at the silk, feeling a tinge of fury and embarrassment wash over her, coloring her cheeks. Her stomach swirled with mixed emotions, but mostly that of hunger. Just as she motioned toward the edge of the bed, she paused.She was looking in the eyes of a beast, and one that could rip her apart in seconds if it wished. She didn't say a word to it, just stared in silent shock.Once it walked away, she found the gall to move again, gently placing her bare feet upon the cold stone floor.Somehow, I'm going to find that damned, vile bloodsucker, she mused angrily. She paused again, snarling at herself. And do what? Complain? What am I thinking?Huffing, she stormed out of the door, but not before looking both ways to make sure she wasn't getting her head chomped off.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The nightmares that swirled in the girl's head had her in a troubled fit as she slept. She woke with a start, covered with a layer of sweat, which, she discovered, is not all she was covered in."}, "post-77577": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515375041000", "message": "Indeed, as she left the room she would see the wolf once more, waiting patiently. As she exited it began to lead the way, heading down the hallway as its paws sunk into the plush carpet that pooled upon the floor. Carefully it navigated down a curved set of stairs, descending from a balcony floor into what seemed to be a ballroom, the floor the same, cold marble as the entryway. The walls were bedecked by mirrors, and above her and the balcony was only blackness, the soft ligfht from her candle giving her a dimly lit circle of light to navigate by. At last, down a few more hallways and a few more glances back by the canine to make certain she had managed to follow it without getting lost, it headed through a doorway through which light spilled through. Within was the Lord Volkh, the crisp freshness of his appearance and the lack of damage on his lapel making it clear he had changed. Before him sat a rather peculiar feast of roasted meats, loaves of hard bread and an entire wheel of old cheese. \"So, you've decided to rejoin us.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Indeed, as she left the room she would see the wolf once more, waiting patiently. As she exited it began to lead the way, heading down the hallway as its paws sunk into the plush carpet that pooled upon the floor. Carefully it navigated down a curved set of stairs, descending from a balcony floor into what seemed to be a ballroom, the floor the same, cold marble as the entryway. The walls were bedecked by mirrors, and above her and the balcony was only blackness, the soft ligfht from her candle giving her a dimly lit circle of light to navigate by. "}, "post-77582": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515376726000", "message": "The young woman's eyes flickered between the food and the vampire's face. Once her eyes landed on his own, she was finding it hard to look back at the food again. As it had before, her heart quickened, though not as rapidly as that first, dreadful meeting. She nodded to him and clasped her hands at her waist.\"Did you, um...\" She pulled at her nightgown, a frown forming on her face. \"Ch-change... where did you find these kinds of things?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The young woman's eyes flickered between the food and the vampire's face. Once her eyes landed on his own, she was finding it hard to look back at the food again. As it had before, her heart quickened, though not as rapidly as that first, dreadful meeting. She nodded to him and clasped her hands at her waist."}, "post-77584": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515377559000", "message": "Waiting quietly for the girl to spit out her question the vampire held her gaze unrelentingly. When at last she managed to ask him, he glanced down at the wolf for a moment as it stepped away from her, prowling past him and out the far door into the depths of the castle. \"This hasn't always been my lair.\" he explained to her, his gaze snapping back to her before she could completely regain her composure. \"Many things have been left behind since I came to be Lord of this castle. Most of them I found no sense throwing out.\" his eyes trailed down her, although dark as they were they hardly offered an easy way to identify such.\"More importantly you're thin, and you're weak. Exhausting yourself only makes the onset faster. Now eat, or I may find you more useful as an experiment than as help.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Waiting quietly for the girl to spit out her question the vampire held her gaze unrelentingly. When at last she managed to ask him, he glanced down at the wolf for a moment as it stepped away from her, prowling past him and out the far door into the depths of the castle. "}, "post-77586": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515378744000", "message": "Caught between fury and hunger, there was only a moment of hesitation before the woman zoomed in on the table and all the food upon it. She had little manners when inhaling her food: after all, it had been days since her stomach had seen so much as a morsel. By the end of it, her hands were laden with grease and crumbs. She leaned back in her chair when she'd had more than enough to eat, making a big, incredibly sated sigh. Her eyes closed briefly, trying to take in what comfort she had now before the reality of the situation settled back in.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Caught between fury and hunger, there was only a moment of hesitation before the woman zoomed in on the table and all the food upon it. She had little manners when inhaling her food: after all, it had been days since her stomach had seen so much as a morsel. By the end of it, her hands were laden with grease and crumbs. She leaned back in her chair when she'd had more than enough to eat, making a big, incredibly sated sigh. Her eyes closed briefly, trying to take in what comfort she had now before the reality of the situation settled back in."}, "post-77588": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515379214000", "message": "Watching her scarf down the food, Lord Volkh hardly batted an eye at her barbaric nature. Instead he waited silently for her to continue, and in her haste she seemed to forget all about him or her situation. It wasn't until she had finally slowed her gorging that she seemed to register the world around her and, as she leaned back in the chair he let her have a few moments of satisfied silence. \"Hardly a feast befitting a guest of my hall. I shall need to go out and collect more before long.\" he offered, once the moment had passed. \"Or perhaps it is you that will be doing it now. You are a servant of Lord Mykola Volkh.\" he drifted closer, reaching down to collect one of her hands as he bend, pressing his cold lips to her fingers. \"And what would be your name?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Watching her scarf down the food, Lord Volkh hardly batted an eye at her barbaric nature. Instead he waited silently for her to continue, and in her haste she seemed to forget all about him or her situation. It wasn't until she had finally slowed her gorging that she seemed to register the world around her and, as she leaned back in the chair he let her have a few moments of satisfied silence. "}, "post-77589": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515380201000", "message": "The girl's eyes fluttered upward when the vampire neared, taking her hand. She was about to pull away but thought better of it, allowing him to greet her in such a way. Her cheeks flushed again, with him being so close.\"Natasa,\" she announced. \"Natasa Waltine. Thank... thank you for the feast, my... Lord.\" The words tasted nasty in her mouth. She'd never met royalty, nor had she served anyone but her fellow townsfolk. They used to think themselves free, then. Now they were just dead.She got up, trying to pull her hand away. \"You told me we would start training soon, during nighttime. I-I want to start as soon as possible if we can.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl's eyes fluttered upward when the vampire neared, taking her hand. She was about to pull away but thought better of it, allowing him to greet her in such a way. Her cheeks flushed again, with him being so close."}, "post-77647": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515444666000", "message": "Her hesitation was noted, although it was hardly offensive. After all, even in the air around her, her very aura, was filled with tension. Allowing her to take her hand back he straightened, looking down at her as she reached her full height. She was more eager than he was expecting, that much was for certain.\u00a0\"We will not be starting tonight.\" he informed her, a statement of simple fact with no sense of apology. \"You've already collapsed once, and have barely eaten. The harder you push yourself and the weaker you are, the easier your curse will make headway. I have already introduced you to the first of my magics. It will slow down the infection, for now, although even now I can sense it straining. You will rest tonight.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Her hesitation was noted, although it was hardly offensive. After all, even in the air around her, her very aura, was filled with tension. Allowing her to take her hand back he straightened, looking down at her as she reached her full height. She was more eager than he was expecting, that much was for certain.\u00a0"}, "post-77672": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515459171000", "message": "\"What? No, I just woke up!\" she protested, hands in fists again. She grasped the front of her gown, trying to swallow her anger. After a pause, her lips curled into a snarl as she asked, \"What... what did you do to me?\"Pain shot through her head again, sending her palm flying to the remaining bump on her forehead. She was ready for it to split apart, like before, but... it didn't. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"What? No, I just woke up!\" she protested, hands in fists again. She grasped the front of her gown, trying to swallow her anger. After a pause, her lips curled into a snarl as she asked, \"What... what did you do to me?\""}, "post-77675": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515460601000", "message": "As she spoke out against his decree, the vampire's piercing glare bored into her. \"You seem to misunderstand your situation.\" he told her, his voice lacked any real malice, and yet his eyes carried a glare that gave his words an undercurrent of danger, beginning to glow faintly red that seemed to grow in intensity from his words. \"You are here because you forfeited your life to me. You live because I allow it, and you will obey, because I command it!\" Volkh's perfect demeanor shattered for a moment as he leaned forward, slamming his fist upon the table with enough force to leave a crater in the marble, sending a spiderweb of cracks over the surface, a powerful punctuation as his voice reached a dangerously snarling crescendo.\u00a0Then, all at once that anger was gone. He hesitated only for a moment before straightening, glancing at the blood as it dripped from his hand and the wounds slowly sealed. Pulling a handkerchief from his doublet he wiped his hand off, once more the calm, collected if not terrifying man she had met. Wiping the dark red blood off his hand he was silent for a moment.\u00a0\"We will begin in earnest tomorrow. For now, I suggest you rest.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As she spoke out against his decree, the vampire's piercing glare bored into her. "}, "post-77678": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515462283000", "message": "When Lord Volk's hand slammed down on the table little Natasa gasped in fright. It startled her so badly she fell back into her chair. She turned away from him, arms held tightly to her chest. Her eyes were wide as the plates on the table. She shrank as much as she could, traumatized by the outburst.Once she was capable of speech once more, she nodded gently, lips aquiver.  \"Y-yes... my Lord.\"She slipped off of the chair, turned away from him, and attempted to make it back to her room silently.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Lord Volk's hand slammed down on the table little Natasa gasped in fright. It startled her so badly she fell back into her chair. She turned away from him, arms held tightly to her chest. Her eyes were wide as the plates on the table. She shrank as much as she could, traumatized by the outburst."}, "post-77681": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515463966000", "message": "When the girl slithered from her chair and darted out of his presence like a frightened mouse, Lord Volkh slowly turned to look at the doorway she had fled through. Despite his cold outward demeanor, his mind was pulsing hot. Every fiber of his being felt like sand, grating on his inner consciousness\u00a0in incessant Need. Formally alone up here, the blood wine was enough. It sated him, although it could not sustain him, forcing him down into the mountains and villages below in search of prey. He had planned his latest feeding to be in a month or so, but now: with this heart beating in his presence, blood pumping through a delightfully new body and so close...He closed his eyes and even here he could hear her heart beating. No matter where she dwelled in his castle he could hear it. More incessant\u00a0than any clock, more tempting than any mortal drink or food. Gripping his hands tightly he turned with a dramatic swoop of his cloak. It was night now, and he needed to take advantage of it before he turned his hunger upon her.\u00a0Outside of the kitchen when Natasa had exited, the wolf lay upon the carpet. It rose to its feet at the sight of her, beginning to lead the way once more to her quarters.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When the girl slithered from her chair and darted out of his presence like a frightened mouse, Lord Volkh slowly turned to look at the doorway she had fled through. Despite his cold outward demeanor, his mind was pulsing "}, "post-77683": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515465857000", "message": "\"Morning,\" dawned on Castle Volkh, the unwelcome sun tinting the sky pinks and oranges, although it would take some time for it to clamor over the mountain peaks and well and truly illuminate the castle. Ultimately though, the light of the sun never reached within, and the concept of \"day\" and \"night\" and became quite perfunctory to those who lived within. Natasa's room might be darkened, if she slept at all that night and if she put out her candle as well. If so the candle would, with the smallest of noises, come alight. As the small fire illuminated the room, it revealed Lord Volkh standing at her bedside, looming over it. \"It is time for your first duties.\" he told her calmly, his eyes no longer solid black but instead mostly human-seeming, minus the crimson irises. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Morning,\" dawned on Castle Volkh, the unwelcome sun tinting the sky pinks and oranges, although it would take some time for it to clamor over the mountain peaks and well and truly illuminate the castle. Ultimately though, the light of the sun never reached within, and the concept of \"day\" and \"night\" and became quite perfunctory to those who lived within. "}, "post-77721": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515545038000", "message": "Natasa did not sleep heavy within the castle. Every creak and every skitter woke the woman for brief moments of dreary-eyed consciousness. When the candle flickered to life, it woke her fully. She sat up in bed, rubbing her eyes wearily until they focused on Lord Volkh. She stopped dead, the memory of the night before replaying itself in her mind.Without further ado, she snaked out of bed, feeling every muscle and tendon complain at the movement due to her trek from nights past. She stood up with a grimace, taking her time to pull to full height and gaze upward at Volkh.\"Where do we start, my Lord?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa did not sleep heavy within the castle. Every creak and every skitter woke the woman for brief moments of dreary-eyed consciousness. When the candle flickered to life, it woke her fully. She sat up in bed, rubbing her eyes wearily until they focused on Lord Volkh. She stopped dead, the memory of the night before replaying itself in her mind."}, "post-77727": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515552585000", "message": "Watching carefully as Natasa got out of her bed, he moved towards the mattress and lying a set of entirely new clothes upon it. Black and white, they were obviously servant's clothing. It seemed, whether he was taking her an an apprentice or not, he was going to make it abundantly clear that she was, indeed, a servant. Not as if he could very well make her wear her rags or nightwear. \"You will bathe yourself appropriately first. We may be the only people here, but I'll not have you scampering about in rags and smelling of death and sweat. Then you will dress. Today I will be showing you around Castle Volkh. Follow.\" he turned, heading towards the open door as he barely gave her time to ask questions or gain her bearings.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Watching carefully as Natasa got out of her bed, he moved towards the mattress and lying a set of entirely new clothes upon it. Black and white, they were obviously servant's clothing. It seemed, whether he was taking her an an apprentice or not, he was going to make it abundantly clear that she was, indeed, a servant. Not as if he could very well make her wear her rags or nightwear. "}, "post-77773": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515633843000", "message": "Natasa's chin lowered to her chest in a glower, but she didn't say a word. Behave, she told herself, for now, do nothing to encourage his wrath.She followed close behind, hands on her elbows as they walked. Her eyes stared venomously at his back.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa's chin lowered to her chest in a glower, but she didn't say a word. "}, "post-77792": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515704030000", "message": "Leading Natasa down the flight of stairs Lord Volkh glanced back at her, not missing the hateful glare she was giving him. Turning forward once more he led her, although spoke up mid-trip:\"I suppose I owe you an...apology. I lost my temper last night which was most unbecoming.\" He did not look at her even as he spoke, merely leading her down deathly silent hallways. \"I can get that way sometimes between...sating my Needs. You have nothing to worry about, I'm satisfied now.\" he told her before reaching a well-etched and fancy door. Clearing his throat lightly he stepped aside, motioning to it. \"This is the bathroom.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Leading Natasa down the flight of stairs Lord Volkh glanced back at her, not missing the hateful glare she was giving him. Turning forward once more he led her, although spoke up mid-trip:"}, "post-77825": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515725324000", "message": "As soon as words about being \"sated\" left the bloodsucker's mouth, Natasa's hand flew up to her neck, searching for a puncture wound. The hand went down to her shoulder, then to her collarbone, an intensely concerned expression passing her features.When she found nothing, she glanced up at Lord Volkh, brow pinched in confusion. She followed him toward the bathroom, becoming more and more bewildered. This, mixed with the ever-present unease that had latched onto her since her first meeting with the vampire put a knot in her stomach. She nodded, placing a hand on the door. She didn't stop staring at him, as though expecting some ill-mannered comment or movement from the man.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As soon as words about being \"sated\" left the bloodsucker's mouth, Natasa's hand flew up to her neck, searching for a puncture wound. The hand went down to her shoulder, then to her collarbone, an intensely concerned expression passing her features."}, "post-77850": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1515770533000", "message": "As Natasa placed her hand n the tarnished silver knob of the bathroom and stared at him, Lord Volkh stared back for several long moment before at last lifting a hand, curling his cold, white fingers and turning his wrist clockwise as if miming working a knob. \"You turn it.\" he reminded her. Then pushing forward with his hand slightly as if to punctuate his point he said, \"Then you push.\"If she followed his expert instructions she would find the bathroom to be the darkest (And dustiest) room yet. Several rats scampered away at the candlelight, and a colony of bats made the domed ceiling appear to be covered in an undulating, living mass of fur. The reliefs carved into the marble baths were gorgeous, and one could only wonder why it was allowed to reach such a sorry state. But there was a faucet that ran into a tub that was several yards wide in each direction, replete with a place to start a fire beneath it in order to warm the water, although it was dark and cold. Hardly suitable for anyone to take anything less than a cold bath. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Natasa placed her hand n the tarnished silver knob of the bathroom and stared at him, Lord Volkh stared back for several long moment before at last lifting a hand, curling his cold, white fingers and turning his wrist clockwise as if miming working a knob. "}, "post-77911": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1515887533000", "message": "The comment was more insulting than what Natasa was expecting. The glare returned just before she opened the door.Right after she did that, the girl screamed. One of the rats scampered right past her foot, sending shivers up her back. After her initial horror passed, her hand slapped right over her nose as the sweet waft of guano and rat feces washed over them.She looked toward Lord Volkh with a look of utter denial. She wasn't going to wash up in there. The stab wound didn't kill her but this would!", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The comment was more insulting than what Natasa was expecting. The glare returned just before she opened the door."}, "post-78117": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1516097186000", "message": "When Natasa screamed, Volkh glanced within as well. Perhaps it was a little worse for wear. The bats stirred at the introduction to candlelight, and her scream had them shifting around unsettlingly. Reaching out he placed a hand on her arm, quickly sweeping her out of the doorway as an explosion of fur and beating, leathery wings filled the silence the bats flowing out of the small door as they chirped their displeasure at the disturbance. Raising his cape to shield her a few of the bats landed on it, quickly taking to the air when the new platform proved to be more fluid than they'd like. Scattering into the darkness they were soon alone once again, and Volkh lowered his cloak.\u00a0\"I haven't needed this room in some time. Perhaps I should have started charging rent.\" stepping into the doorway once again a few rats still scittered about, but fought to hide themselves from the light from his candles. \"Well, it seems as if we've found your first project.\" he noted. \"The bucket is in the corner. We'll skip your bath today, but allow me to resume the tour. I'd rather you know where you can and cannot go.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Natasa screamed, Volkh glanced within as well. Perhaps it "}, "post-78216": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1516232152000", "message": "Natasa was no stranger to cleaning. Her family owned a farm and she wasn't some spoiled brat, but this was beyond disgusting even for her. She shuddered at the thought, but the longer she was able to put it off, the better. She nodded to him, edging away from the bathroom door. It was a strain not to cough or gag from the smell alone.\"Where I... cannot go?\" she asked curiously, mostly to distract herself from the bath.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa was no stranger to cleaning. Her family owned a farm and she wasn't some spoiled brat, but this was beyond disgusting even for her. She shuddered at the thought, but the longer she was able to put it off, the better. She nodded to him, edging away from the bathroom door. It was a strain not to cough or gag from the smell alone."}, "post-78420": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1516395009000", "message": "Walking away from the open door, her knew she's likely be following. After all, she seemed eager to get away from the vile room they had seen. He knew, by her question, that her curiosity was getting the better of her. After all, he'd been quite a curious sort in his youth as well. Perhaps it was best to start with these areas. Best to simply get the law of the castle established. Leading the way down the labyrinthine hallways, he motioned to the occasional door, beautifully engraved mahogany on brass hinges that blocked off a number of mundane rooms. Listing them off as they walked along, it was clear he had little interest in most of them. There was a study, a few bedrooms with little worthy of note, linen closets, nothing terribly vampiric as of yet. As they approached the front of the manor, however, he stopped at a door different than the rest, not far from the kitchen. Made of metal, it appeared newer than whatever else he had shown her. Across its facade, twisted, grotesque faces gave it the appearance of screaming faces within,all consumed by fire.\u00a0\"This is my laboratory.\" he explained calmly, gesturing towards the door as he stopped next to it. It hardly seemed inviting, and he turned towards Natasa as if to gauge her reaction to it. \"You are never to enter the laboratory without me present. This is where your advanced studies will occur. When within, refrain from touching anything I tell you not to. That curse can quite quickly become the least of your worries.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Walking away from the open door, her knew she's likely be following. After all, she seemed eager to get away from the vile room they had seen. He knew, by her question, that her curiosity was getting the better of her. After all, he'd been quite a curious sort in his youth as well. Perhaps it was best to start with these areas. Best to simply get the law of the castle established. Leading the way down the labyrinthine hallways, he motioned to the occasional door, beautifully engraved mahogany on brass hinges that blocked off a number of mundane rooms. Listing them off as they walked along, it was clear he had little interest in most of them. There was a study, a few bedrooms with little worthy of note, linen closets, nothing terribly "}, "post-78589": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1516582893000", "message": "Natasa was slightly taken aback as she gazed at the door, wondering if the carvings upon that were just carvings or the conjurations of demonic beings sealed within. She lifted her hand with a curiosity stirring in her brain, daring her to touch it. Caution put her hand back down. If those faces really were more than carvings, she was going to have a bad time. Lord Volkh would probably slap her hand away or roar at her, anyway. Better to get on his good side now.She did have one question that might put him on edge, however.\"What could be worse than this curse, m'lord?\" she asked, gazing up at him with both childlike bewilderment and a little bit of venom in her tone. She kept it light, fearing his temper.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa was slightly taken aback as she gazed at the door, wondering if the carvings upon that were just carvings or the conjurations of demonic beings sealed within. She lifted her hand with a curiosity stirring in her brain, daring her to touch it. Caution put her hand back down. If those faces really were more than carvings, she was going to have a bad time. Lord Volkh would probably slap her hand away or roar at her, anyway. Better to get on his good side now."}, "post-78730": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1516744211000", "message": "Staring at her for a moment of silence, Lord Volkh considered his answer. \"You'll soon see.\" he told her with a sweep of his cape, facing the door as it opened seemingly on its own. Stepping into the darkness within while holding aloft the candelabra. As the faint light illuminated the contents within he progressed slowly, soon revealing an array of strange apparatus and bottles, boiling seemingly without fire. Atop one of the tables were a number of intricate weapons. Daggers, axes, swords, all seemingly mundane. Next to them, another oddity set on the ground: A squatting gargoyle, larger than the others that horded upon his castle. On it, several runes had already been etched, shimmering as light passed over them. At last he stopped at the bars of a cage, letting her step in front of him. So far back was it the light failed to reach, terminating in a wall of darkness from which a slight shuffle of chains could be heard. An animalistic howl cut through the dark, a creature launched itself from the darkness, jerking against chains etched with numerous runes. A horrifically pallid creature that snapped at them, its jaws almost seeming to lunge further from its head than would be possible. Its flesh was covered by numerous scars and, from its head, curled two, familiar-looking horns. \"What's worse than your curse, I imagine.\" Volkh muttered darkly from behind her, veiled partially in shadow. \"Is the studies it will take to make certain no one else ends up like you. I suspected my apprentice's influence when I found this...creature years ago. It is of an ilk I had never seen. The spawn of something far more foul, more hateful than I could ever recreate. A creature with so much hatred in its body should be incapable of rational thought. From what you've told me, however, my apprentice is capable of lucidity. Of thought. This is the end result of your curse if it overtakes you. But you should thank your senior. With the studies he's been through, I have the knowledge and the magic to slow the progression of your curse to a crawl. If you flee the castle, or if I am to be destroyed, you would likely have a matter of days before it overcomes you. At you current rate I give you a year.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Staring at her for a moment of silence, Lord Volkh considered his answer. "}, "post-79036": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1517285075000", "message": "Natasa stared at the creature with an unreadable expression. Her hands came together at her waist, fingers picking at her nails. The longer she looked at it, the more evident her unease became. Her breath quickened, her eyes grew larger, her heart was pounding. This is what she would become? A creature devoid of all humanity, a slave to its rage?She looked up at Lord Volkh, nails digging into her skin now. \"Only a year?\" she breathed. She looked back down at the creature, and then again to the vampire. If he was killed, then her curse would spread, and she would become the very thing she was trying to destroy.But Lord Volkh had started this whole thing, taking that vile menace as an apprentice. It was all his fault! The very fact that she had to rely on him wasn't fair!As the rage within built up, the second horn pierced the skin, though not as violently as it did before. Natasa placed a hand on her forehead, trying to stop the flow of blood and ease the pain. It didn't grow as the other did and was barely an inch long, but it was a good reminder that Lord Volkh wasn't the only factor keeping it at bay. She had to put effort into this, too.She took in a deep breath and let her shoulders slope. One year. She had one year to learn how to defeat the lich and learn to reverse the curse.\"I'm going to make every second of it count, then.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa stared at the creature with an unreadable expression. Her hands came together at her waist, fingers picking at her nails. The longer she looked at it, the more evident her unease became. Her breath quickened, her eyes grew larger, her heart was "}, "post-79039": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1517287629000", "message": "As Natasa struggled with this information, Lord Volkh watched her with apparent interest. Perhaps the cold cavity that held his withered heart was eager to be in the presence of emotion. Raw and powerful, it was almost overwhelming to one who had banished themselves to solitude. He could feel her heart, hear it as her blood pumped faster, her breath came in short, uneven gasps. Then she turned to him, her visage changed once again as the horn broke through and the creature, momentarily still during their conversation gave a final, futile lunge against its chains.\u00a0\"If you truly mean to fight it, then you must armor yourself with determination. Arm yourself with knowledge. You will not be doing battle with a creature such as that beyond my castle before you slay what holds you back. Your hesitation, your fear, even your rage. It makes you weak, simple, these are the emotions of beasts, not of man. Focus your mind and your steady your hand. Then we can begin in earnest...apprentice.\"\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Natasa struggled with this information, Lord Volkh watched her with apparent interest. Perhaps the cold cavity that held his withered heart was eager to be in the presence of emotion. Raw and powerful, it was almost overwhelming to one who had banished themselves to solitude. He could feel her heart, "}, "post-79053": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1517331362000", "message": "Natasa's mind swam with questions. What determination do I have... without those? she thought. Such a thing confused her. She had plenty of determination when she was walking up the mountain. That couldn't have just been her rage and her fear pushing her away from her village.Her village...Why hadn't she been thinking of them? Her whole family, all her friends, faces she'd been familiar with for her whole life, were all gone. How is it she hadn't been mourning this whole time? Where had her sadness gone? She tried to remember the faces of the people she lost, but they wouldn't come. Was it the curse? Was that what was stopping her?She turned, facing Volkh in full. She couldn't find it in her heart to mourn them, but she wanted to. That was good enough for now.\"Then let us finish the tour and get on with it.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa's mind swam with questions. "}, "post-79100": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1517429273000", "message": "When Natasa voiced her agreement, Lord Volkh inclined his head slightly, turning with a flourish of his cape. Walking away without a word it was clear he expected her to follow him and, once they had cleared the metal door to the laboratory it slammed shut behind him, the gust of wind it created disturbing the dust that had collected in the carpet. The rest of the tour seemed expedited, largely unused kitchens, washrooms and other areas that likely would have no strong bearing on her stay here. Only a few places were worth the time to stop. The first of these were behind a pair of sliding, mahogany doors. \"This is the library.\" he informed her, turning away from the doors to address her. \"Many of these books are even older than I, so care is requested.\u201d sliding the doors opened he revealed a remarkable room, force one surprisingly clean of dust, similar to his laboratory. Massive bookshelves stretched up to the second tier, separated by a balcony-like protrusion that led to a second tier of books. Tight circular staircases fed between them, a solid wood bannister securing one's descent. The carpet spread across the entirety of this room and several tables stood at attention, waiting for someone to crack a book open at them. It seemed as if this place likely had once been full of natural sunlight during the day, a multitude of windows covering the walls, but that time had long since passed. Each were fastened tightly with more wooden shutters, blocking hem from any hope of the outside world. \u201cYou may use the library freely during your off hours, but no book is to leave this room.\u201d he announced although, after a moment he sideyed her. \u201cYou...can read, can\u2019t you?\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Natasa voiced her agreement, Lord Volkh inclined his head slightly, turning with a flourish of his cape. Walking away without a word it was clear he expected her to follow him and, once they had cleared the metal door to the laboratory it slammed shut behind him, the gust of wind it created disturbing the dust that had collected in the carpet. The rest of the tour seemed expedited, largely unused kitchens, washrooms and other areas that likely would have no strong bearing on her stay here. Only a few places were worth the time to stop. The first of these were behind a pair of sliding, mahogany doors. "}, "post-79150": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1517516949000", "message": "\"I... of cou- I...\" Natasa was flustered, red coming to her cheeks as she looked away and folded her arms. She wouldn't have had such a hard time admitting her illiteracy if he hadn't seemed to critical about it. \"W-who doesn't know how to read?\"She regretted the words almost as soon as they came out of her mouth. Peasants like her didn't know how to read. People who were farmhands their whole life and had most certainly never even seen a book or had the money or need for tutoring. It wasn't her fault at all! Why did it have to be such a big deal?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I... of cou- I...\" Natasa was flustered, red coming to her cheeks as she looked away and folded her arms. She wouldn't have had such a hard time admitting her illiteracy if he hadn't seemed to critical about it. \"W-who "}, "post-79212": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1517612142000", "message": "At Natasa's insistence, Lord Volkh returned to her a doubtful look. He could hear her blood flow faster, the speed of her heart increasing to compensate. Perhaps she was simply annoyed by such an obvious question, but unless things had changed in that time... Typically he would simply continue his tour, but if she'd come here with such ludicrous requests to be his apprentice and lacked the most basic skills for it...\"Watch your tone, girl, or I may rescind my offer of healing. Do you know how to read? If you do not answer me truthfully you will waste both of our time. I have time to spare; do you?\" he asked pointedly. Her passion may be what was keeping her standing so strong against the tides of her curse, but he needed her under his control. He could not risk another apprentice dismissing their master. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "At Natasa's insistence, Lord Volkh returned to her a doubtful look. He could hear her blood flow faster, the speed of her heart increasing to compensate. Perhaps she was simply annoyed by such an obvious question, but unless things had changed in that time... Typically he would simply continue his tour, but if she'd come here with such ludicrous requests to be his apprentice and lacked the most basic skills for it..."}, "post-79221": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1517616628000", "message": "The young girl gritted her teeth and twined her fingers. She didn't look at him as she spoke, only kept her eyes on the floor. She didn't want to look someone like him in the eye when she was admitting something so shameful. \"No,\" she said finally, making sure he would hear her, that there was no mistake of it: she couldn't read!It wasn't her fault. She didn't choose to be a peasant. She didn't choose to be attacked. She didn't choose to be cursed. She sighed, shoulders sloping. Everything just wanted to work against her. \"Does that mean I can't apprentice?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The young girl gritted her teeth and twined her fingers. She didn't look at him as she spoke, only kept her eyes on the floor. She didn't want to look someone like him in the eye when she was admitting something so shameful. \"No,\" she said finally, making sure he would hear her, that there was no mistake of it: she couldn't read!"}, "post-79498": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1518146660000", "message": "When Natasa admitted her shame, the vampire peered down at her. So, she lacked even the ability to read. He hadn't exactly expected her, an obvious peasant, to be able to but with only a year to spare and so much for her to learn, it was fruitless to start from such a base foundation. When she asked if she could still apprentice, however, he placed a hand on his chin as if in consideration. \"We shall be forced to alter your training. I had not wanted to do this until you understood the repercussions of using your talents but you don't have the time for such luxuries. Tell me: I know you're willing to die to become my apprentice. However, are you prepared to let another die with you? For you? Are you willing to accept the responsibility of creating an extinguishing an existence to further your goals? To rid yourself of your curse?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Natasa admitted her shame, the vampire peered down at her. So, she lacked even the ability to read. He hadn't exactly expected her, an obvious peasant, to be able to but with only a year to spare and so much for her to learn, it was fruitless to start from such a base foundation. When she asked if she could still apprentice, however, he placed a hand on his chin as if in consideration. "}, "post-79714": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1518575781000", "message": "Natasa looked up at Volkh with her eyes narrowed, brow pinching. \"What do you mean, m'Lord?\" she asked, innocent of the implications of his proposal. Someone else to die for her? Was he speaking about himself? The creature in the laboratory? Someone else entirely?\"Who else would have to die for my sake?\" she prompted again. The notion did not seem to sit well with her, but she was still determined.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa looked up at Volkh with her eyes narrowed, brow pinching. \"What do you mean, m'Lord?\" she asked, innocent of the implications of his proposal. Someone else to die for her? Was he speaking about himself? The creature in the laboratory? Someone else entirely?"}, "post-79719": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1518580894000", "message": "When Natasa expressed her doubt, Volkh shook his head. She was difficult to crack, but in the end she would have no choice. Looming over her, he peered down, his eyes glowing faintly in the small amount of light the candelabra provided. Sweeping past her, he clearly intended for her to follow and didn't answer her at first. Down the twisting, dark hallways they went, passing the bathroom at the foot of the stairs which had once been filled with bats. It was no longer empty, however: Within, creatures of stone toiled, deformed and terrifying in visage. Gargoyles, similar to those that wreathed his castle walls scrubbed floors and wiped down surfaces with cloth. Each was only about three or four feet tall, looking all too much like stone imps. The servants of Lord Volkh bowed as he passed and he coldly ignored them. It seemed the amount of work she'd be forced to do had been somewhat exaggerated. Halting at a door, not far from where she herself had been sleeping in he eyed it. Strangely, of all the doors in the house, with their magnificent craftsmanship and deep, bold colors this one was different. Seemingly untouched by time, this door was white, a knob of crystal set within its frame. He did not reach for the handle, stepping aside to look at his apprentice. \"When you enter this room, touch nothing but what I tell you to. Do nothing I do not say. Keep your eyes to the floor, and do not seek to observe your surroundings.\" he instructed, although this time was...different than when he'd said it before his laboratory. He was stoic, far more inhuman even. It was as if he himself were made of stone. \"What you need will be sat upon the bed. You will understand when you see it. Bring it out here.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Natasa expressed her doubt, Volkh shook his head. She was difficult to crack, but in the end she would have no choice. Looming over her, he peered down, his eyes glowing faintly in the small amount of light the candelabra provided. Sweeping past her, he clearly intended for her to follow and didn't answer her at first. Down the twisting, dark hallways they went, passing the bathroom at the foot of the stairs which had once been filled with bats. It was no longer empty, however: Within, creatures of stone toiled, deformed and terrifying in visage. Gargoyles, similar to those that wreathed his castle walls scrubbed floors and wiped down surfaces with cloth. Each was only about three or four feet tall, looking all too much like stone imps. The servants of Lord Volkh bowed as he passed and he coldly ignored them. It seemed the amount of work she'd be forced to do had been somewhat exaggerated. "}, "post-79911": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1519265680000", "message": "The young woman had to trot after Lord Volkh to keep up with him, matching four strides to his one. This wasn't completely unusual to her, as she'd always been a rather small girl, but there was something else to the vampire's stride that threw her off kilter. She couldn't place it, but perhaps his very existence unnerved her enough to throw her off.As they passed the gargoyles, Natasa marveled. When had Volkh given them orders? It had all happened much faster than she'd had time to observe. Perhaps he had some kind of connection to their minds that she wasn't yet privy to. The thought made Natasa shudder inwardly. If that was something that would come to pass, what kind of things would she witness inside of the bloodsucker's mind? She didn't want to think about it.Now they were in front of somewhere new. She eyed the door with suspicion, as she had done to everything in the castle. She moved her eyes from the crystal doorknob and gazed at Volkh for a good moment before aiming her eyes at the floor. What in the world was he having her do now?Reaching her hand out, she did as she was told, grasping and turning the handle, and pushing the door open. She advanced, keeping her eyed solidly on the floor in front of her.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The young woman had to trot after Lord Volkh to keep up with him, matching four strides to his one. This wasn't completely unusual to her, as she'd always been a rather small girl, but there was something else to the vampire's stride that threw her off kilter. She couldn't place it, but perhaps his very existence unnerved her enough to throw her off."}, "post-79921": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1519277530000", "message": "As soon as the door opened, one could feel\u00a0the difference in atmosphere that had been allowed to exist. The typical, crimson carpet so full of dust, ended in a straight, manicured line where the door had covered moments ago. Within, the carpet was white and even in the dim light one could see that it was pristine in its condition. The rest of the room, perhaps one might expect, was as clear as the floor, however under Lord Volkh's orders it was up to Natasa if she wanted to risk sparing the glance. Directed as she was, Natasa would find the bed a straight shot inside, and as he ordered her to move, she would soon see a pair of legs. A woman's legs, clad in stockings.What sat upon the bed appeared to be human if not for the unyielding skin and supernaturally pale complexion. In fact, if one inspected it closely, they would find the resemblances to look less and less human and more and more like a child's doll, brought to life in excruciating detail. What Lord Volkh would want with such a thing, or why it would be within his walls was a question that went without answer.\u00a0\"Lady Volkh,\" the sudden words from the doll may have been enough to frighten the poor girl as it spoke in a lilting, inhuman cadence. \"You have returned! I was beginning to fear I may not see you again.\" her words were barely above a whisper, but clear as with a soft whir of movement it looked into Natasa's face.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As soon as the door opened, one could "}, "post-80018": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1519867759000", "message": "The girl looked up, very slowly, to stare the woman in the face. No shudder of fear ran through her body, which was odd, considering the nature of everything in the castle since she first set foot inside. Though the woman was otherworldly in appearance, Natasa found instead that her curiosity had taken control here. She tilted her head to the side and frowned, reaching out to wave a hand in front of the person. Perhaps she was asleep? Maybe blind? Was it even real?When the doll finally popped into action, Natasa jumped, though she kept her eyes on the woman before her the whole time. \"I-I think you may be confused,\" she told the entity before her. \"I... I am not Lady Volkh. My name is Natasa. Natasa Waltine.\" Her brows pinched as she peered at the woman in more detail. What had that noise been?\"What... um... who are you?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl looked up, very slowly, to stare the woman in the face. No shudder of fear ran through her body, which was odd, considering the nature of everything in the castle since she first set foot inside. Though the woman was otherworldly in appearance, Natasa found instead that her curiosity had taken control here. She tilted her head to the side and frowned, reaching out to wave a hand in front of the person. Perhaps she was asleep? Maybe blind? Was it even real?"}, "post-80243": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1520398711000", "message": "\"Oh Lady Volkh, you do so love your jests.\" the doll replied in a voice barely above a whisper, tilting her head slightly in an uncanny fashion as she admired the woman before her. \"I am your loyal Divyna milady.\" the doll assured her, giving a slight incline of her head. She lifted her head slightly as she stared at the empty doorway behind her. \"Ah, my Lord Volkh! I have not seen you in so very long!\" she spoke, voice only slightly louder, but she received no such reply from the vampire that awaited in the shadows of the hallway. Rising daintily to her feet, the doll moved in an natural, fluid motion, as if lifted by a series of invisible strings. \"Lady Volkh, would you like for me to get you a snack? You always enjoyed bread and honey, would you like some?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Oh Lady Volkh, you do so love your jests.\" the doll replied in a voice barely above a whisper, tilting her head slightly in an uncanny fashion as she admired the woman before her. \"I am your loyal Divyna milady.\" the doll assured her, giving a slight incline of her head. She lifted her head slightly as she stared at the empty doorway behind her. "}, "post-80244": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1520399086000", "message": "From the darkened doorway there was silence, no sign of the intimidating vampiric presence Natasa no doubt had come to expect looming over her shoulder. Once the doll stood, however, a voice emanated from the shadows: \"Bring it out here.\" he commanded, his voice strangely wary. \"Keep your eyes to the floor as I have told you and leave the room. It will follow you of its own volition.\" he instructed coldly. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "From the darkened doorway there was silence, no sign of the intimidating vampiric presence Natasa no doubt had come to expect looming over her shoulder. Once the doll stood, however, a voice emanated from the shadows: "}, "post-80271": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1520488528000", "message": "\"How helpful,\" Natasa groaned. Just when she thought things couldn't get any stranger, this oddity pops up. Was she a vampire, too? Perhaps she was a deranged one. Why in the world did the bloodsucker want her to retrieve her?With a deep sigh, the young girl put her eyes on the ground, turned, and walked out of the room. Her curiosity would have gotten the better of her had she not already thought of all the horrible, twisted things that were waiting for her in the darkness of the room. Hmm. Perhaps that was how the lady behind her had lost her mind? The thought made her ill.Once outside, Natasa looked up at Volkh with confusion. \"What is she?\" the girl pried, \"And why does she call me Lady Volkh?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"How helpful,\" Natasa groaned. Just when she thought things couldn't get any stranger, this oddity pops up. Was she a vampire, too? Perhaps she was a deranged one. Why in the world did the bloodsucker want her to retrieve her?"}, "post-80273": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1520490346000", "message": "When at last Natasa stepped out of the room with the doll at her heels, it turned to close the door quietly. Turning its head back and forth in the candlelight it offered no words of explanation or clarification at Natasa's question. Eyeing it quietly, Volkh did not speak at first and it seemed for a moment as if he had no intention of explaining the curious creature's presence. \"It is a golem. A construct, similar to the gargoyles. Another of my creations made to serve a singular purpose.\" he informed her mercifully. \"As to why it calls you Lady Volkh: It seems to developed a few quirks in its runes. I layered so many upon it that at times, they may begin to conflict with one-another.\" Turning away, he began once more to lead the way, allowing the doll to hold the candelabra as it followed silently, the gentle but insistent ticking of a clock accompanying the sound of shoes upon the marble floor. \"You cannot read, and I have no time to teach you. As such, I'm forced to provide you something I myself am incapable of harnessing. Do you know what a Familiar is, apprentice?\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When at last Natasa stepped out of the room with the doll at her heels, it turned to close the door quietly. Turning its head back and forth in the candlelight it offered no words of explanation or clarification at Natasa's question. "}, "post-80301": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1520621762000", "message": "Natasa eyed Volkh suspiciously, but she did not press the matter. She would reveal that secret in time.\"Familiars... that's what witches have. Demons enslaved to obey their orders and share a part of their soul. That's what everyone used to say, anyway,\" Natasa told the vampire. Though the villagers were poor and did what they could to work off the land, they did have a little knowledge of magic. Sometimes medicine women would come by... and sometimes they were witches that would help, and every now again hurt, people within the village.What did this have to do with the golem? \"Is that what she's going to be? You're... going to make her my familiar?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa eyed Volkh suspiciously, but she did not press the matter. She would reveal that secret in time."}, "post-80449": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1520900712000", "message": "At Natasa's word Lord Volkh scoffed somewhat, shaking his head. \"Shamans and hedge witches may be the most magic your village had seen, but the familiars they can muster are mostly cats or dogs whose minds are bent to their wills, spirits of the elements or indeed even demons stitched crudely to their souls in an attempt to mimic the binding of true familiars. The process for you will be much more intimate.\" he explained as they reached the door of his laboratory once more and he hardly stopped as it opened for him, allowing the trio to slip into the darkness within. Descending to his chambers he glanced back at the girl and doll as they stepped in, the light of the candelabra all Natasa could hope to see by in the overwhelming darkness within. Once more upon the stone floor he turned towards Natasa, looking past her to Divyna. \"The process you will undergo will prove rigorous, but necessary. There are many types: Some form a contract with beasts magical and otherwise, granting them sentience and power in order to channel the more enigmatic energies of the universe through their sheer will and spirit. They are efficient vessels but crude and take time to perfect. Time we do not have.\"With a wave of the vampiric lord's hand small orbs began to alight: Different vials of five colors at equal points around each of them: Yellow, orange, blue, green and a final, largest one: Crimson and roiling in a disconcerting fashion. This light was enough to provide some visibility, dimly lighting the brass equipment and giving it an unsettling ambiance.\u00a0\"The second type is more powerful and yet more complex. Primarily, however, it is deadlier. The binding of demons and elemental spirits. Of fairies and of genies. Most times this contract is sealed to the detriment of the spellcaster however there are many recorded who had the same motivations of these beings and forged a contract of equal terms. Some even become friends or, at rare times, lovers. There are none of those to be acquired so easily, and you have nothing with which to forge a contact that does not already belong to me.\"Pointing to where Natasa should stand he placed Divyna so that they stood back-to-back and, picking up a vial separate from the colors that connected them, yet filled with glowing, white contents he began to pace a strange circuit around them. His pale hand tilted, letting spill the liquid to the floor in a long continuous line that simply lie where it fell despite its liquid appearance creating a steady outline.\u00a0\"The third process is one that I coined in my...more lively days. It involves a construct, such as Divyna here. I can place within these empty receptacles a fraction of the contractor's soul. This gives them a life I normally would seek to stifle. A sense of existence previously unheard of among the crafted beings. A False Familiar they have been called, but I assure you that they are quite real. The costs, however are more...visceral. Spirit and blood must be paid in equal measure to secure a mind worth controlling. They require no bonds of loyalty from you, and will provide you with powers no mere beast could grant you. More importantly you will have an unparalleled, sleepless defender and servant.\"As he drew to the end of his trek he made certain to stop outside of his handiwork: A glowing white star, in perfect, unmarred detail with each tip ending at once of the colored vials.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "At Natasa's word Lord Volkh scoffed somewhat, shaking his head. "}, "post-80544": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1521148648000", "message": "Natasa followed him quietly this time. His lectures were filled with information she was going to need, and she had noted a particular shift in his tone. Things had become a little more serious.Now and again, she would gaze back at the doll, the golem, the thing. Even with the eeriness about her, she didn't feel quite as wary of it as she did everything else in the castle, especially Volkh. Even if he was trying to save her life, he was the most frightening thing there. She watched him most carefully as he spoke, now and again wrestling with that strange urge to be hypnotized by his general existence. The lich that attacked her family made her feel like meat, something that was already dead and gone, but Volkh made her feel like a rabbit that was still being chased. That and... and something else. Something about being cornered: the girl couldn't yet discern it.Once they reached the laboratory once more Natasa felt a queasiness to her stomach. There were a lot of strange and unfamiliar things in this room that she hadn't taken the time to look at before. Her focus had been on the creature that she might soon become, but now that she had time to digest everything else, panic was attempting to settle in again.Everything in the room felt like a small part of something bigger, like the organs of a beast. Her ears still focused on Volkh's voice, but for now, her eyes belonged to everything else. Even as she was asked to stand back to back with the doll, signaling that something had already begun, she watched what magic was being concocted around her. At least, she thought it was magic. Everything that wasn't immediately explainable had to be just that.Near the end of his lecture, Natasa was looking at Volkh just like that panicked rabbit she saw herself as in her mind. She fought to swallow her anxiety and fear.\"How... will I be sacrificing these, M'Lord?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa followed him quietly this time. His lectures were filled with information she was going to need, and she had noted a particular shift in his tone. Things had become a little more serious."}, "post-80779": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1521785017000", "message": "\"This is a lesson that would be better served by experiencing.\" Volkh replied in a cool, even tone, yet all around them the vials of colors began to pulse, all at once. A heartbeat of science and magic made one. An artificial heartbeat. No, not artificial, an echo. It was her\u00a0heart they beat in time with. The beat of the only heart within the room. Behind her the doll stood ridged, its body suddenly snapped to its full height as if inert once more.\u00a0\"It is important that you do not attempt to leave the star I have created.\" Volkh warned, now that the ritual had begun. \"If you do so, even I cannot save you from the repercussions. To function as my apprentice your will must be as sharp as your mind. You must be willing to accept my teachings...as well as the pain they may inflict. No gentler teacher could save you from the fate that hounds you, and to counter a curse as menacing as your own. Not without sacrifice. Follow the motions of the doll to the letter. Do not hesitate, it will continue the ritual\u00a0 whether or not you are in position, and no doubt it would be quite fatal.\"It seemed teaching on the fly was her new master's method as the doll turned then to face her. With a gentle motion she reached out her hand, right palm facing Natasa with fingers splayed outwards, as if hoping she might take it and lace her fingers with her own.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"This is a lesson that would be better served by experiencing.\" Volkh replied in a cool, even tone, yet all around them the vials of colors began to pulse, all at once. A heartbeat of science and magic made one. An artificial heartbeat. No, not artificial, an "}, "post-80847": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1521947261000", "message": "Well, there was absolutely no turning back now. She couldn't even step out of the circle. Knowing that her choice had now been made helped guide her actions, though she was still afraid of the pain that was surely about to overwhelm her when her blood, spirit, and mind was given to the, ah-Natasa turned as she was told and faced the doll, looking into her eyes. A doll is what Volkh called her, but even if that's what she resembled, Natasa wasn't sure if that was what she wanted to call her. Perhaps she was more like a ghost? No, not quite, thought Natasa. Her mind whirred for answers when she held her hand up to the doll's, palm to palm, cautiously threading their fingers together. She looked into the painted eyes of her soon-to-be familiar. Perhaps she was more like a maid, but she really wasn't quite human. Natasa's brow knitted in concentration. What do I call you?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Well, there was absolutely no turning back now. She couldn't even step out of the circle. Knowing that her choice had now been made helped guide her actions, though she was still afraid of the pain that was surely about to overwhelm her when her blood, spirit, and mind was given to the, ah-"}, "post-80848": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1521948073000", "message": "The doll, face-to-face with her would-be contractor, curling her finger around Natasa's hand as the woman too it. Then, unexpectedly, she took a step closer, until their bodies were not far from one-another. DivynaA whispered answer in electric air. The tension, the magic, the roiling of unknown formula, everything was nearly overwhelming. Then reaching up the doll pressed her hand to the nape of Natasa's neck, leading her to lay her horned head against her unyielding shoulder. Then, her painted lips close to her ear she whispered a gentle sentance:\"I'm so sorry, Lady Volkh.\"In their joined grip, from the heel of her carefully crafted palm, a jagged spike shattered through false porcelain impaling with a tear of flesh and sinew, shoving aside bones where it could, and shattering those it couldn't. The spike slide through the parallel heel of Natasa's palm as if her flesh were nothing but cheap fabric and did not cease extending until it was well down her forearm, the appendage bulging disturbingly at the instrusion. Around them the lights burned bright as the spike began to draw blood, seeming to carve away a fraction of her being in a terrible, visceral ritual of torturous gore.\u00a0\"Shh,\" she whispered, as if consoling a frightened child, and not a woman, hideously mangled by her very hand. \"I'm so close to finishing, Lady Volkh, please be patient.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The doll, face-to-face with her would-be contractor, curling her finger around Natasa's hand as the woman too it. Then, unexpectedly, she took a step closer, until their bodies were not far from one-another. "}, "post-80993": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1522214191000", "message": "Natasa didn't immediately realize what had happened until it was far, far too late. A sharp breath pushed its way into her lungs as the pain washed over her, a precursor to the scream that echoed through the entirety of the castle, alerting them all of the trauma, the intrusion, the madness- her vision whited as she attempted to squirm out of Divyna's grip, only to find that the movement gave her no relief and gave way to even more torture. The doll's whispers did nothing to calm the cursed girl down. She could only scream, and scream, and scream again, but she did not try to fight until her body gave a mighty shudder. Her skin was awash with fluids- snot, tears, spit, blood- some that she nearly choked on in her spasm.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa didn't immediately realize what had happened until it was far, far too late. A sharp breath pushed its way into her lungs as the pain washed over her, a precursor to the scream that echoed through the entirety of the castle, alerting them all of the trauma, the intrusion, the madness- her vision whited as she attempted to squirm out of Divyna's grip, only to find that the movement gave her no relief and gave way to even more torture. The doll's whispers did nothing to calm the cursed girl down. She could only scream, and scream, and scream again, but she did not try to fight until her body gave a mighty shudder. Her skin was awash with fluids- snot, tears, spit, blood- some that she nearly choked on in her spasm."}, "post-81027": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1522295541000", "message": "The pain that wracked Natasa seemed to feed the ritual, as the vials burned brighter, trembling as if prepared to erupt or even explode from the pressure. Divyna continued her soothing words, inscrutable among her contractor's screams of agony. Draining her blood, her terror, her very soul her grip only tightened as Natasa's got weaker. Now the vial's light began to die. They faded, pulsing dangerously fast with their various lights. Then, with the briefest movement and the sound of a cloak, Volkh had taken a leap towards them. Grasping Natasa in his arms he raised a hand to the back of her head, red light pulsing in the palm of his hand.\"Sleep.\" he commanded in a voice that cut through all agony, all suffering, slicing to the very core of his apprentice's perceptions with one whispered statement. Then, as surely as if he had enveloped her in his cloak and spirited her away, her emotions and consciousness was swathed and she was asleep. With the sound of squealing metal, the spike retracted, tearing out of Natasa's hand as the doll stood, staring blankly ahead, hands folded before her. Darkness overcame them once again. Natasa would wake to find herself lost within it. The only point of reference behind an unbelievably soft bed beneath her, with sheets of silk. \"So you've awaken at last.\" the vampire lord's voice said from the darkness and it was clear he was within arm's length. Beside her even, his head lower than if he'd stood...In the same bed?! ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The pain that wracked Natasa seemed to feed the ritual, as the vials burned brighter, trembling as if prepared to erupt or even explode from the pressure. Divyna continued her soothing words, inscrutable among her contractor's screams of agony. Draining her blood, her terror, her very soul her grip only tightened as Natasa's got weaker. Now the vial's light began to die. They faded, pulsing dangerously fast with their various lights. Then, with the briefest movement and the sound of a cloak, Volkh had taken a leap towards them. Grasping Natasa in his arms he raised a hand to the back of her head, red light pulsing in the palm of his hand."}, "post-81078": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1522463490000", "message": "Waking up was hazy. She hardly felt and she certainly couldn't think. Without trying to get up, the girl turned to her side, fatigue still wearing her limbs down. As soon as she'd made the move, she paused.\"... M'lord?\" she questioned, scrunching her brow. \"What...?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Waking up was hazy. She hardly felt and she certainly couldn't think. Without trying to get up, the girl turned to her side, fatigue still wearing her limbs down. As soon as she'd made the move, she paused."}, "post-81247": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1522776129000", "message": "Her hand was bandaged and, while not in pain, she would find it to be quite numb and moving her fingers even slightly would be a momentous task. The vampire snapped his fingers, and on either side of the bed candelabras, free-standing ones in the corners, lit. At the foot of the bed, a fireplace followed suit. This room was obviously living quarters, however the massive four-poster bed was twice as large as her own. The sheets were black silk that seemed to absorb light and what lay atop them, spread evenly with mechanical precision was a deep red duvet. A suit of armor stood at attention at one side of the room, the gleaming mithral strangely absorbing. One skilled or knowledgeable enough would be able to identify it being of Elvin make, and very fine at that. \"You have been asleep the better of four days.\" he informed her as he got to his feet, revealing himself to be wearing as little as she herself was. That being nearly absolutely nothing but bandages on her part and, (Thankfully), trousers on his own. \"It has been quite dull waiting for you.\" he added, although he picked up a brass tray. A man of his stature, one might realize, would expect him to own silver. It didn't take much to understand why he would eschew that idea of nobility. Producing a brass stand he placed it over her lap, and set the tray atop it with a clatter. Clearly he had expected her awakening to the minute, as the porridge was still steaming, filled with a collection of berries. Beside it set a brass cup of coffee and beside that a sweetroll on a small saucer. \"I trust you're hungry?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Her hand was bandaged and, while not in pain, she would find it to be quite numb and moving her fingers even slightly would be a momentous task. The vampire snapped his fingers, and on either side of the bed candelabras, free-standing ones in the corners, lit. At the foot of the bed, a fireplace followed suit. This room was obviously living quarters, however the massive four-poster bed was twice as large as her own. The sheets were black silk that seemed to absorb light and what lay atop them, spread evenly with mechanical precision was a deep red duvet. A suit of armor stood at attention at one side of the room, the gleaming mithral strangely absorbing. One skilled or knowledgeable enough would be able to identify it being of Elvin make, and very fine at that. "}, "post-81264": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1522815660000", "message": "Natasa looked at Volkh.Then she looked away.And then she looked at Volkh again, longer this time.Finally, she turned her head away once more, lifting one hand to block her peripheral. This created quite a problem as the tray of food was slipped into her lap, as she couldn't move her other arm at all. \"M-m'lord?\" she squeaked, all the whites showing around her olive eyes. She had so many questions but she couldn't bring herself to ask even one of them. She keeled over as her stomach growled, four days without sustenance clawing at her stomach. Scrambling for a compromise, she tilted her head away from the vampire, feeling heat rise to her cheeks, internally screaming like a boiling kettle. She began to scoop food into her mouth using the spoon she was given. Strange, that. She usually had to use her fingers.Just like before, Natasa found the food nearly irresistible. It was more flavor than she could ever remember having when she lived in the village. Then again, there wasn't much she could remember anymore... thinking about it just threatened to boil her insides with anger, so she dismissed it for now.\"... thank you,\" said the girl once she was finished. She wiped her lips with the back of her hand. \"B-but I have questions, um...\" She hadn't taken the time to contemplate her own state.\"Why. Why all of this? Why am I...\" She gestured to herself. \"And why are you-\" She gestured to him. Immediately after she pulled up the sheet, trying to cover herself.He's seen everything, she thought with despair.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa looked at Volkh."}, "post-81266": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1522816919000", "message": "She was quite flustered. Although she attempted to maintain some modicum of composure he could hear her heart beat faster, and see the flush those rose to her cheeks as easily as she could have on a sunny day. The sun. That was a far-off memory even for her, she hadn't seen it in almost a week, after all. Still, for now he amused himself by watering her eat, his eyes flickering over her face and at her covered body as if trying to ascertain every fiber of her being. She finished quickly, and he found her addressing him once again. Naturally she had questions. The ritual had been intense, and her would-be Familiar was no where in sight. The magics, and how he had kept her relatively intact these past few days would no doubt also be on her mind. He had many answers prepared for her expected questions, many lessons each answer would hold. Yet, she posed to him a question he had not considered. Such a mundane, human question that for a moment he stared at her in quiet disbelief before, quite unexpectedly, he gave a short dry laugh. The laugh of one who has not done so in so very long. It held some mirth, but tempered and very quickly the unprecedented burst of emotion was gone. \"You went through likely the second most painful experience in your short lifetime, binding an entity to you for eternity in a ritual and the first question you ask is about your state of undress? Very well, your question amuses me and so I will answer it. Your clothes were covered in vomit, sweat and blood. I would not want you to be in such a state for nearly a week. I had you cleaned and disposed of the defaced clothing. Dressing you again would have merely been a waste, as you would be asleep for some time with the spell I had placed you under. For myself, my laboratory is currently mid-ritual and should not be disturbed. So I thought I would merely rest until you awoke.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She was quite flustered. Although she attempted to maintain some modicum of composure he could hear her heart beat faster, and see the flush those rose to her cheeks as easily as she could have on a sunny day. The sun. That was a far-off memory even for her, she hadn't seen it in almost a week, after all. Still, for now he amused himself by watering her eat, his eyes flickering over her face and at her covered body as if trying to ascertain every fiber of her being. She finished quickly, and he found her addressing him once again. "}, "post-81356": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1523149763000", "message": "\"-ah!\" Natasa opened her mouth to protest, holding the sheets up until they were above her shoulders. \"You don't just... that's not just... you can't just-\" She paused, lips clopping together as she sulked. Of course, he can. I belong to him now.She really wasn't thinking of all the implications when she made the deal with him to be his apprentice. No, she was more than that. Perhaps \"slave\" was a better term used for her current position. She sighed and buried her face in the sheets, trying to choke down the shame. Though she would have loved to curl up in a corner and perish, she knew she had some important questions to ask. She turned her face to him, biting her lip.\"... thank you, M'lord,\" she began, giving him the appreciation he very well deserved, despite his depravity. \"But I do have a lot of questions. I'm afraid I can't remember much. Where is... Divyna? What happened to my arm? I thought vampires slept in coffins. I didn't think they took off their clothes to rest.\"She felt herself getting worked up again, brows pinching. Even with the important questions at hand, she could not let this go!", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"-ah!\" Natasa opened her mouth to protest, holding the sheets up until they were above her shoulders. \"You don't just... that's not just... you can't just-\" She paused, lips clopping together as she sulked. "}, "post-81360": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1523151525000", "message": "Despite what he had considered quite a satisfactory answer to her question, she did not seem to be entirely satisfied. If anything she looked more unhappy. While her happiness was of no great importance to him, as he felt for her the same he did for an injured bird or sheltering animal, her mental state was of some concern as it tied directly into the progress of her ailment. He could not have her feral or bedridden before they had even begun their work. Yet, she seemed to push past that unease, delving into questions more within his area of expertise.\u00a0\"Divyna remains where you left her. She stands in the center of my laboratory, within the star. The ritual has yet to be completed but do not fret, the painful part has ended. All she requires is a touch of your hand and it will link you. You will find yourself capable of accessing a few valuable skills immediately. Not to mention she can read to you, thus eliminating the need to teach you before you begin, although I will arrange for that to be part of the lessons.\" glancing down at her nearly-paralyzed hand he held up his own, curling the fingers a few times as if to demonstrate. \"The feeling will come back in the passing weeks, but be certain not to neglect it as it can suffer from disuse. I have nearly fully repaired it, but time is in charge of the remaining.\"Now, however, they were once more back to their earlier topic. With a wave of his hand a nearby wardrobe opened, and he took out a royal blue doublet. \"You seem concerned. I do not sleep in any coffin, although it is not as far off the mark as you would expect. Often if I must rest, it is within enclosed spaces with no chance of light breaking through, even if something were to happen. However I rarely find I need to sleep at all. Sometimes, when considering particularly difficult formulae, or solving problems. Or, as recently, when I must wait. This is, however, my room and covered in your blood as I was, I thought it prudent to get my doublet cleaned. Is there an issue with my state of undress?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Despite what he had considered quite a satisfactory answer to her question, she did not seem to be entirely satisfied. If anything she looked "}, "post-81367": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1523152872000", "message": "Fully repaired it?Natasa pinched her brow and closed her eyes, trying to remember the moments that had passed right before darkness had consumed her. She remembered... looking into Divyna's eyes, holding her hand. She was speaking so softly... apologizing. Whatever for?Pain shot through her forehead as the horn pushed through her forehead, growing another inch. She grit her teeth and pushed her head into her knees. She remembered it, just for a second! But it quickly left her mind, as it had before. She looked up at Volkh, letting her body shudder from the memory. \"N... no, M'lord,\" she whispered. \"Th-though it is not in proper form... for most maidens to sleep in a man's bed before she is wed. O...or to, um... are there any more women's clothes around?\"Really, she was more concerned about her own state of undress. What was Volkh thinking? As a vampire, was he oblivious to his effect on people? To women. Or was it everyone? Either way, she could hardly imagine the bloodsucker had no idea of the implications!", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Fully repaired it?"}, "post-81699": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1523910934000", "message": "Of course he had ideas of the implications and, despite his proclaimed ignorance, he was fully aware of the implications he'd placed upon her. Perhaps it was punishment for lying to him about reading before, and he thought she deserved somewhat of a start. Or perhaps it was merely a source of entertainment to see her so flustered. When the horn split further from his head, however, he more directly faced her, looking it over with mingled interest and a modicum of frustration. He had though his studies to be complete enough to halt the transformation completely, only to be shown it was far from perfected when she had arrived. \"Do not force yourself to recall something best left to the past.\" he reminded her. \"Your perceptions will be clouded moving forwards.\" Stepping aside he picked up a piece of folded fabric. \"You will find your new set of clothes in the bathing room. I suggest you be quick, I have no desire to wait for too long when you must reactivate your Familiar and allow me the use of my lab once again.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Of course he had ideas of the implications and, despite his proclaimed ignorance, he was fully aware of the implications he'd placed upon her. Perhaps it was punishment for lying to him about reading before, and he thought she deserved somewhat of a start. Or perhaps it was merely a source of entertainment to see her so flustered. When the horn split further from his head, however, he more directly faced her, looking it over with mingled interest and a modicum of frustration. He had though his studies to be complete enough to halt the transformation completely, only to be shown it was far from perfected when she had arrived. "}, "post-82390": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1525043900000", "message": "The girl hugged the sheets to her, staring at Volkh as he spoke. Alright, so her clothes were in the bathing room. All good and well.Except not.If the bloodsucker would leave, she would gladly skip away to change, or at least attempt to do so. Her grip on the sheets tightened. \"Will you... look the other way then, M'lord?\" she asked, raising a brow. If he obliged, she planned to slip out of bed as fast as she possibly could to get dressed and return, however, there would be much trouble if he did not.He wasn't reacting to her embarrassment, she noted. Just her pain. She wasn't expecting the horn to explode from her skin, either, but she was beginning to see a trend. Pain, fear, hate. They caused them to come forth. She would have to be so much more careful, though who knew how easy that would be with someone like Volkh around.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl hugged the sheets to her, staring at Volkh as he spoke. Alright, so her clothes were in the bathing room. All good and well."}, "post-82661": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1525923786000", "message": "With a shrug of ultimate disinterest, the Lord Volkh acquiesced to Natasa's seemingly paltry request and with a slight billow of his cape he turned on his heel. \"I recommend you do so quickly, as my patience for such games is quite thin.\" he remarked without turning, broad shoulders creating a waterfall of velvet down his back which rippled with each movement. The affects of his presence were not lessened, per se, but one could feel a modicum of security out from beneath his calculating gaze. He waited, then, like a statue. No eddy of movement or breath stirred him from his place until Natasa may eventually return, hopefully in the timely manner he was accustomed to. It was not difficult to find the bathing room once again, as it was not far from her own room. After a descent of the sweeping stairs, mahogany railing framing her descent, it stood open. As always darkness consumed the castle, and she would be forced to bring along the candelabra that had been as ever-present in her vicinity as the clothes on her back. More-so, it seemed. Within a clothes lay draped carefully over a metal rod...they were stunning things of silk and lace a far cry from what she had worn before, and nothing at all like the rags in which she had crawled here in. They were tight, but not overly so. After all, they were for sitting and tea, not for visiting. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "With a shrug of ultimate disinterest, the Lord Volkh acquiesced to Natasa's seemingly paltry request and with a slight billow of his cape he turned on his heel. "}, "post-82730": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1526412469000", "message": "The young girl did not hesitate to rocket forth from the bed and make her way to the bathing room. She held tightly onto her limp arm as she descended, trying to keep it from flopping around like a dead chicken's corpse. Once she found her clothing, she changed as quickly as she could, though it was quite the challenge with only one working arm. She didn't vocalize her dismay, but she was already beginning to wonder how much abuse her body would take. When she looked down at her body, she could see the gap in her chest where the lich's sword had pierced her skin, saw the spidery veins of corruption grasping outward. It had a very dim glow to it.Her heart, her arm, her head... what would be the next thing to be marred with such ferocity, such disregard to her youth and innocence?She pulled the dress on sourly. It hid the scar well and felt so soft against her skin. She had never owned anything so lovely before, especially comparing it to the coarse clothing they wore as peasants. What a sweet lie of luxury that Volkh loaned her.Once dressed, she padded up the stairs back to Volkh's room. \"I\"m finished.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The young girl did not hesitate to rocket forth from the bed and make her way to the bathing room. She held tightly onto her limp arm as she descended, trying to keep it from flopping around like a dead chicken's corpse. Once she found her clothing, she changed as quickly as she could, though it was quite the challenge with only one working arm. She didn't vocalize her dismay, but she was already beginning to wonder how much abuse her body would take. When she looked down at her body, she could see the gap in her chest where the lich's sword had pierced her skin, saw the spidery veins of corruption grasping outward. It had a very dim glow to it."}, "post-84870": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1536350831000", "message": "It hadn't taken long for Natasa to reappear, a fact not lost on her vampiric lord. Without uttering a word he turned, exiting the room and assuming she would be following close behind. Somehow the walk seemed longer this time, although it was clear the proportions of the castle had not shifted in some unknowable way. Perhaps it was merely the finality of their destination. Once again they sought to descend those stairs, to return to the place she had to be carried from before as a bleeding, tortured mess. They would once more be in the laboratory...and with it. The very thing that had caused this pain and, most importantly, the thing that she was to entrust her life to.\u00a0With a shudder the tortured, metal door to the descent creaked open without a hand to coax it. Down the cramped, dark stairs, the candelabra she held casting complete shadow on the steps past the Lord Volkh. At last they emerged into the darkened room once again. The usual apparatus, burning or boiling, churning with light and hums, were silent. The room was still, as if every feature were carved out of the same humorless marble as the floor beneath their feet. And there, in the center, was the doll. The familiar was silent, tilted forward slightly. The strange plaster that had covered its arm was still shattered, revealing the terrible syringed, caked in dried blood. Her dried blood.\u00a0\"Touch it,\" Volkh instructed calmly. \"Once you do, it will be bound to you. It will be your guardian, your tutor and your helper.\" he made no mention to the pain it had put her through. Instead he merely extended his hand towards it, stepping aside so she could walk past him. \"Most importantly it will be out of my lab so I may get back to work.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It hadn't taken long for Natasa to reappear, a fact not lost on her vampiric lord. Without uttering a word he turned, exiting the room and assuming she would be following close behind. Somehow the walk seemed longer this time, although it was clear the proportions of the castle had not shifted in some unknowable way. Perhaps it was merely the finality of their destination. Once again they sought to descend those stairs, to return to the place she had to be carried from before as a bleeding, tortured mess. They would once more be in the laboratory...and with "}, "post-84956": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1536535239000", "message": "The walk to the alchemy room was so muted it was maddening. Natasa grabbed the end of her dress, rubbing the texture against her thumb to try and fill her mind with some kind of distraction. She desperately tried to not think about where they were going and the memories that it had triggered earlier. The spell was not perfect. She had to meet it halfway.Once they stepped inside of the chamber, the girl took in a breath and held it before raising her eyes.There it was, the noise that had been gone during the entire walk from Volkh's bedroom to this place. She heard the doll's soft, chilling voice rivaling her agonized screams. Natasa glanced at the vampire, then turned her head to look back at the doll.Without a word, she approached the golem, her feet pattering softly on the marble ground. She paused right before the figure, keeping her eyes away from the red-stained syringes. Instead, she chose to look into the doll's eyes.What was your name again? You told me.She reached out her good hand, trembling like a tree branch in a whirlwind. As swiftly as she could, she tried to tap the golem and back up hastily, tripping over her feet in the process.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The walk to the alchemy room was so muted it was maddening. Natasa grabbed the end of her dress, rubbing the texture against her thumb to try and fill her mind with some kind of distraction. She desperately tried to not think about where they were going and the memories that it had triggered earlier. The spell was not perfect. She had to meet it halfway."}, "post-84967": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1536546483000", "message": "The doll's eyes were a silent analogue of her own. Paint and unseen mechanisms that stared ahead, derelict and void of any semblance of emotion. It made no move when Natasa reached for it, as still and foreboding as a monolith. It was the light touch upon the construct's cheek that stirred it, the soft whisper of fabric a delicate whir of its movements. With a careful turn of its head it acquired its new master. \"Lady Volkh,\" the construct announced, her voice clear, yet not overwhelming in the otherwise perfect silence. \"It is so lovely to see you again. How may I be of service to you today?\" she strode forwards, her eyes not leaving Natasa's before she came to a stop before her. \"I apologize for the inconvenience you had to suffer due to my actions. I am Divyna, and will aid you in your studies.\"Satisfied things were going well, Volkh passed the two of them, reigniting the coils of heated copper and vials with a sweep of his hand. without a word he approached one of the empty ones, referencing a nearby book and beginning to pour a series of chemicals into a beaker. \"The ritual is complete. You're through here. The library will have what you need to read.\" he told her without even a glance back. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The doll's eyes were a silent analogue of her own. Paint and unseen mechanisms that stared ahead, derelict and void of any semblance of emotion. It made no move when Natasa reached for it, as still and foreboding as a monolith. It was the light touch upon the construct's cheek that stirred it, the soft whisper of fabric a delicate whir of its movements. With a careful turn of its head it acquired its new master. "}, "post-85242": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1537387758000", "message": "Natasa pushed herself up onto her feet, all the while staring at the doll. She was just as before, porcelain and perfect, but the young girl knew of the horrors that Divyna hid inside now. The thought made her shudder.She didn't tell her \"It's alright,\" or \"I forgive you,\" because neither was true. She very much doubted that the golem actually cared that much anyway. The apologies were simply pleasantries. When Volkh passed them, busying himself with those nasty vials and liquids. Turning away, Natasa sneered. \"Yes, M'lord,\" she said, gesturing for the doll. \"Take me to the library.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa pushed herself up onto her feet, all the while staring at the doll. She was just as before, porcelain and perfect, but the young girl knew of the horrors that Divyna hid inside now. The thought made her shudder."}, "post-85317": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1537884563000", "message": "Natasa's desire to keep far from the Lord of Castle Volkh was certainly progressing according to her wishes. The mansion, as expansive and wrapped in swaths of darkness as it was, seemed to plot on its own, keeping the two denizens far apart. For a month, as Divyna followed Natasa dutifully, instructing her on the facilities and more importantly, reading aloud to her in the dusty old library. The subjects were most elementary and elemental. Theoretical works on the basics of magic, enchantment, and how the body itself was the most valuable conduit into these elusive energies. It's blood, it's bone, even tissue were each a physical component of spellcasting. One's own...or another's.\u00a0Lord Volkh's absence was absolute. Not even the whisper of his presence was seen in these formative days. Yet, every \"morning\" (for there was no sun to gauge what time it may be, and Divyna dutifully allowed Natasa to sleep as long as she wanted unless specified otherwise.) Upon entering the library, they would find a new selection of books, complete with a set of written instructions on how best to pursue the next day's lessons. It was a lonely, uneasy feeling in the castle's heart, and aside from the dire wolves that would, upon rare occasions, pass by them, Natasa and Divyna were very much alone. Even the gargoyles, it seemed, were deactivated or simply ignoring them.\u00a0Yet, as far as things went for a poor girl from a village, the cursed young woman was well taken care of. Divyna handled any basic tasks that needed care. From washing clothes, providing new outfits, stitching those that might have been damaged, preparing food and running warm baths she recommended were regularly utilized. The golem even offered to help with the washing, although whether that was a step too far in Natasa's case was up to her. The doll's presence had other, unanticipated benefits as well. As time passed, her gift of seeing perfectly in the dark had been somewhat translated for her mistress' benefit. This allowed the girl to get around the Castle without the fire of the candelabra, if she so chose. At the very least it prevented her from becoming hopelessly lost without it.\u00a0A month had passed, on the dot, when one \"morning\" the girl was no longer alone. Divyna sat as silently as usual,\u00a0 although now her head she turned away from Natasa, towards a shadowy figure at the foot of her bed.\u00a0\"I believe it is time for us to begin.\" Volkh announced smoothly.", "link_list": ["https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PS8ALhXLrPg"], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa's "}, "post-85329": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1537931553000", "message": "Volkh's absence was somehow as relieving as it was frightening. She was expecting his shadow to loom over her always. At least then, she would know where he was. Without his presence, she had no clue what he was doing or when he was watching. The young woman simply assumed that he was watching always, silently judging her.The thought made her steam. Well, she was silently judging him, too! Now and until the day she struck him down!These feelings calmed any doubts she had with staying by Divyna's side. She learned as dutifully as she could, brooding and coping in her own way. Thankfully, nothing happened during this time to fuel her curse. Curiously, she did notice that a full inch of her roots had grown in grey. Once she was able to see more clearly in the dark, it seemed that it also had a soft blue shade to it. This made her frown every time she looked in the mirror. It wasn't enough that the horns and the fiery chasms in her skin marred her appearance: it had to change the few things that still made her seem human, too.After the first few weeks, Natasa stopped looking in the mirror. She focused on these books and words that Divyna read to her, instead, hanging onto every word. They felt like the only guide she had, stumbling around in the dark castle. She could navigate the halls perfectly now, but only Divyna's guidance made her feel a little less lost.Nearing the end of the month, she was beginning to feel some semblance of comfort. That sort of thing came with routine. Eventually, it just became too tiring to be paranoid.Such a feeling was always betrayed when the inevitable happened. When her eyes flickered open, landing on the figure at the edge of her bed, it was like getting slapped in the face. Still, she knew this day would come, she just hoped it wouldn't come soon.\"Begin?\" she asked, pushing herself up with her good arm. \"Training, right? But... what part, exactly?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Volkh's absence was somehow as relieving as it was frightening. She was expecting his shadow to loom over her always. At least then, she would know where he was. Without his presence, she had no clue what he was doing or when he was watching. The young woman simply assumed that he was watching always, silently judging her."}, "post-85469": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1538344313000", "message": "\"Practical application.\" Volkh told her, his voice bereft of any passion. As if her beginning her studies into the fabric of reality were as dull as a nighttime stroll in the nearby town. Taking a few silent steps he extended to her a hand, standing where Divyna had done so every morning in the course of Natasa's integration. Whether or not she accepted it, he stepped away as soon as she was ready. \"We will begin in the ballroom. It has enough space for you to exercise your abilities and more importantly, no risk of you disrupting my experiments.\" With that he opened the door, gesturing for her to follow him. He did not pick up the candelabra again, clearly well-acquainted of her newfound ability to see in the dark. The three of them wandered through the dark hallways. Muffled sounds of rain, coupled with the occasional crack of thunder seemed as if they were the affairs of a world quite separate from their own. Weather was an unnecessary consideration for those locked inside, but it did create an ambiance slightly less unsettling for most than the choking silence that typically weighed heavily on each step. Approaching the doors, Volkh opened his arms, causing the heavy oaken portal to swing its double doors inwards. Beyond the ballroom dwell, surprisingly free of dust and cobwebs. The floor was polished to a beautiful shine and, surprisingly, there was light. In the darkness it was nearly blinding to be exposed to the room, though if it bothered him he did not show it. One could expect it were hosting a room of adoring party-goers, an idea at-odds with the empty shell of the room. In the center of the room several tables had been moved in, obviously of high quality, but knicked and stained in places by weapons and experimentation. Tomes and other occult material decorated the tabletops, along with a caged dove that cooed softly. A strangely serene creature in this place. \"Today I will witness you cast your first spell, as well as test your grasp of the basics. If you fail to grasp them, you will be studying for another week, and it will be I who presides over it. I will not appreciate the distraction from my work.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Practical application.\" Volkh told her, his voice bereft of any passion. As if her beginning her studies into the fabric of reality were as dull as a nighttime stroll in the nearby town. Taking a few silent steps he extended to her a hand, standing where Divyna had done so every morning in the course of Natasa's integration. Whether or not she accepted it, he stepped away as soon as she was ready. \"We will begin in the ballroom. It has enough space for you to exercise your abilities and more importantly, no risk of you disrupting my experiments.\" With that he opened the door, gesturing for her to follow him. He did not pick up the candelabra again, clearly well-acquainted of her newfound ability to see in the dark. "}, "post-85516": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1538444185000", "message": "When Volkh moved closer, any waking grogginess she had vanished, replaced by a feeling that was very familiar, but so much more... pungent. She could have sworn that he had taken hold of her with his hands and was pulling her towards him, the feeling was so strong. Her cheeks pinked feverishly and her skin burned as she gazed at him, her hand grasping his without so much as a thought.A voice raged in her head as he guided her, fighting against the heavy charm that befell her. It reached for her anger and her desperation, finding enough of a hold that she was able to tear her gaze from the vampire briefly. She let out a small, sharp gasp, taking in her surroundings. When... when did they arrive here?Natasa turned her head to address Volkh and found herself getting lost in that mysterious, pervasive aura about him again. She flicked her hand away and pinched the bridge of her nose, dug her nails into her skin. Her grip was still weak from Divyna's ritual a month before, but her claws were sharp enough to scratch the skin. The pain was sharp, and though it did not rid her of the charm, it allowed her to get a hold of her senses for a moment more. She took in a deep breath.\"... how am I to do that... like this?\" she asked, eyes on the ground.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Volkh moved closer, any waking grogginess she had vanished, replaced by a feeling that was very familiar, but so much more... pungent. She could have sworn that he had taken hold of her with his hands and was pulling her towards him, the feeling was so strong. Her cheeks pinked feverishly and her skin burned as she gazed at him, her hand grasping his without so much as a thought."}, "post-85628": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1538889462000", "message": "Volkh had already turned towards one of the nearby tables, beginning to set the various objects in a more organized pattern when she at last asked her question. He stopped, momentarily, straightening as he turned to loom over her once again. It was difficult to tell where his solid-black eyes truly were looking, but it was impossible not to feel the barely-restrained predatory undertone to them. \"What seems to be the issue here?\" he pressed, voice as impassive as ever.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Volkh had already turned towards one of the nearby tables, beginning to set the various objects in a more organized pattern when she at last asked her question. He stopped, momentarily, straightening as he turned to loom over her once again. It was difficult to tell where his solid-black eyes truly were looking, but it was impossible not to feel the barely-restrained predatory undertone to them. "}, "post-85916": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1540158126000", "message": "Natasa wrung the end of her frock in her hands, lips puckered together furiously.\"You can't tell me you don't know!\" she grumbled. \"It's inconceivable. You're doing it on purpose, aren't you? To make it hard for me. Or to... I don't know! But you've got something in mind by doing it.\" She turned to the side, trying with every fiber of her being to reject the feeling. \"I understand I'm yours now, but this is a lot, don't you think? It's... torture.\" She held her breath, trying to spit out the last of her words.\"I mean... wouldn't it be better to focus on that after I get rid of the curse? If you're so adamant about it!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa wrung the end of her frock in her hands, lips puckered together furiously."}, "post-86067": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1540436317000", "message": "Lord Volkh mused over the issues voiced by his apprentice. Yes, he knew all too well the affects he had on her. Affects that may well disturb her performance. Unfortunately, despite his studies, he found no easy solution to the problem. The disease of vampirism had evolved this particular trait millennia before even he had contacted it. A psychic pheromone of sorts, designed to lull prey into a false sense of security. To want the kiss of his teeth upon their throats. There were solutions, naturally, but anything long-term could be physiologically harmful, and the effects upon her tainted blood might have unforeseen side effects.\u00a0\"I assume you mean the sexual nature of my \"aura\", for lack of a better term.\" he addressed clinically.\u00a0There was, of course, an easy solution. One that readily came to mind, he imagined, for both of them, although her thoughts were most certainly clouded. \"Although my gift grants me great power, I do not have full control of them. I doubt any of my kind ever have attained such.\" he explained, walking away from her to pick up a stiletto from a nearby table. The spike of metal glinted in the light of the chandelier above them. A blade made for thrusting, for killing. It was no knife with practical use. It only existed for one reason: The extinguishing of human life. Using the blade he pricked his finger, and even as the wound healed a small bead of dark blood balanced on the tip.\u00a0\"You see, despite what you may think, my powers are not entirely for my benefit. Vampirism is a disease. Impossible to cure, as it physiologically alters its host.\" setting aside the blade he approached, displaying the tiny drop for her view. \"and every ability it grants, every boon, every weakness, is made to propagate said disease. I need blood to feed myself and fuel its corruptive power. The sun and fire are weaknesses because it can only exist in certain temperatures. It grants me strength, speed, and other less obvious abilities all in the name of spreading my \"curse\" to the rest of humanity. Similarly, this is why you desire me. A corruption of desire driven by the evolutionary powerhouse that is vampirism. I have no more control of my magnetism, than you do of resisting it.\" holding out his index finger with the drop of blood, he motioned to it.\u00a0\"Consume this. It will give you temporary resistance to my more addictive abilities. We are, in essence, \"tricking\" it into thinking I had you. I'll spare you the details of how this works, as I doubt your sensibilities could handle it.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Lord Volkh mused over the issues voiced by his apprentice. Yes, he knew all too well the affects he had on her. Affects that may well disturb her performance. Unfortunately, despite his studies, he found no easy solution to the problem. The disease of vampirism had evolved this particular trait millennia before even he had contacted it. A psychic pheromone of sorts, designed to lull prey into a false sense of security. To "}, "post-86206": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1540762655000", "message": "The girl dared only to flicker her eyes in his direction as he picked up the sword and began to explain his condition. She pulled together every mote of concentration she had to try and listen to the words instead of the magnetism that was pulling her body towards his. Every prickle of her nails into her skin worked less and less until it wasn't helping at all. She was taking in steady, deep breaths when he approached, holding out his hand.She first gazed at the dollop of blood on his finger, then looked up at his face. A part of her was certainly insulted at his insinuation! But that part of her just didn't matter right now.The only hesitation came from a chance to look him in the face, and almost at once she swiped the blood from his hand with a finger and plopped it into her mouth.It wasn't like her to be so optimistic to willingly accept drinking someone's blood- especially that of a monster!- but this was a special occasion. Not only was he offering a reprieve from this madness that made her wage war within her own head, but she really wanted whatever piece of him he was going to offer.There was disappointment in realizing that it wasn't working right away. Her body shook as she gazed up at his face, her barriers dropping when she decided not to keep them up, believing it was going to fix everything.She didn't even know that she'd taken a step towards him, was leaning slightly forward, expression soft. The light from her mortal wound dimmed. She was more at ease than she had been since her entry into the castle a month before, content with just gazing at his face.Not a minute passed before the effect ebbed away, and Natasa took hold of her emotions again. Her face reddened in embarrassment for the twentieth time. The world was clear now, but also much darker than it had been a minute ago. She let out a breath, frowning.\"I... I'm ready,\" she told him, looking away. \"Which spell would you have me do first?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl dared only to flicker her eyes in his direction as he picked up the sword and began to explain his condition. She pulled together every mote of concentration she had to try and listen to the words instead of the magnetism that was pulling her body towards his. Every prickle of her nails into her skin worked less and less until it wasn't helping at all. She was taking in steady, deep breaths when he approached, holding out his hand."}, "post-86209": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1540765790000", "message": "The moment that passed stretched to eternity after she had ingested the blood. He knew it would take a little time to activate, and already it seemed as if it might be too late to stop her from doing something she may come to regret. Yet, the effects as it entered her system overtook her and once more she calmed. Satisfied they were once more on track, he motioned her towards the nearby table. \"This lesson, we will focus on the most basic of spells. You notice the changes elicited from you when you bonded with your familiar? You are capable of sight even in darkness now.\" he motioned around him at the lit ballroom. \"Your enemies may not be so fortunate. Humans cannot see in the dark, and lighting torches takes time. Assuming you find yourself in conflict with one, you may find that the advantage this brings to be the difference between life and death. The somatic components of this spell are quick and precise. They can be difficult to reproduce with accuracy during combat so for now, you shall learn them in peace. You must plunge this lit room into darkness.\" with a wave of his hand a nearby book flipped over, pages frantically turning until it had settled on the spell he spoke of. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The moment that passed stretched to eternity after she had ingested the blood. He knew it would take a little time to activate, and already it seemed as if it might be too late to stop her from doing something she may come to regret. Yet, the effects as it entered her system overtook her and once more she calmed. Satisfied they were once more on track, he motioned her towards the nearby table. "}, "post-86294": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1540964446000", "message": "Natasa approached the book slowly, eyes scrawling the page. She still couldn't recognize the words put together, but she did recognize the symbol in the middle of the page. It was extremely simple: a small circle in the middle, with two diagonal lines atop it pointing left and right, and one line pointing downward. When she thought about it, it looked like two fingers pinching out the flame to a candle.She dedicated the symbol to memory, stepped back, then gazed around at the candles in the room one by one. There were so many of them! Was she really supposed to extinguish every single one? She'd never manipulated magic before and the task seemed daunting.Closing her eyes, the young woman recalled Divyna's voice. Magic is will, she'd said. You use magic by imposing your will onto the world.\"As simple as it sounded, Natasa also remembered that such a task was not easy. Sure, one day, she would be able to extinguish these candles with a thought, but for now- \"Gestures, symbols, and words are all used to focus magic. These are valuable tools for fledgling spellcasters.\"Keeping this in mind, Natasa raised a hand and drew the symbol, right to left, like her golem, had taught her. Then, she tried to envision the candles in her mind, dancing gently from the draft. There was a phrase to this, wasn't there? To make it easier. Oh, what was it again?As she closed her hand, she stuttered the word, \"N... nocht?\"The flames flickered... then stilled again before her eyes opened, leaving her to stare at a bright, very much not dark, room. Her frown dragged at her cheeks. Why hadn\u2019t that worked?She closed her eyes again, drew the symbol, then closed both her hands over it. \"Nocht!\" she growled. The lights dimmed, nearly dead this time, but stood tall once her lids peeled back, staring at the exact same scene.Natasa\u2019s expression darkened. Her chin nearly met her chest as her glare swept the room, casting a shadow across her eyes. The energy in the room changed, rising in temperature as she began the spell once again. Raising both hands this time, she roared in a much deeper voice, a commanding voice:\u201cNOCHT!\u201dHer hands clapped together in front of her, creating a shift the air that batted at the candlelight, snuffing it out and bathing them in darkness. Natasa gave a tiny gasp, startled at her achievement.Soon, a grin spread from ear to ear. She made something of a laugh, mouth ajar.\u201cI did it!\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa approached the book slowly, eyes scrawling the page. She still couldn't recognize the words put together, but she did recognize the symbol in the middle of the page. It was extremely simple: a small circle in the middle, with two diagonal lines atop it pointing left and right, and one line pointing downward. When she thought about it, it looked like two fingers pinching out the flame to a candle."}, "post-86416": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1541218923000", "message": "Dispassionate observation followed Natasa's every movement as she went to the collection of arcane paraphernalia that lay meticulously arranged across the nearby table. Stepping back to allow his apprentice space. She lacked the will to command magic, that much was immediately evident in his study. A common mistake of those forced into magic, rather than pursuing it of their own volition. Even now she went through the motions, the things taught by her Familiar, but like her Familiar she lacked the correct mental fortification to exert herself. The spell fizzled ineffectually, and for a moment Volkh had been about to interrupt.\u00a0\"Nocht!\"\u00a0He caught himself, the lights flickering more fiercely. Yes, she understood. Emotion was often the spark to the tinder of will. While it was safer to rid yourself of it for more precise spellcasting, at the moment he held his tongue. If she could merely get the magic coursing, then she may not find herself quite so dependent on regaining it. The candles remained burning and he watched as her mounting frustration spurred her on. The first spell cast was a valuable one in a spellcaster's repertoire, and one he found valuable to complete on ones own. Under the proper precautions, naturally.\u00a0The Lord's eye focused closely on his apprentice as he felt the surge of arcane power welling up from within her. With it, however, a burst of heat. Heat enough to cause a dent in the chill atmosphere he himself exerted. With a clap of her hands the lights flickered out, plunging them into darkness that his eyes rapidly adjusted to. That was certainly peculiar. Was it the infection within her? Or perhaps something more potent? As she smiled in triumphant victory, three slow claps cut through the darkness around them as he approached.\u00a0\"Very good.\" he addressed, looking her over. \"Casting your first spell was no mean feat. I had expected to have to go through your training in more intimate detail. You're ready, then, to proceed into a more complete understanding on the structure of the arcane. A study we must suspend for another time.\" Reaching up he grasped her chin between his thumb and forefinger, turning her head back and forth and looking her over as if she were prized livestock.\u00a0\"Yes, I believe you are presentable enough for a reward. Your Familiar will have completed sewing the clothes you will need by now. She will also aid you with...accessories and such. I'm afraid my many talents won't do you much good on that front. Bathe and prepare yourself by the time I return.\" he released her, turning to stride away. \"You will need to look appropriate for a ball with the Empress of Isra.\" he addressed, sweeping out of the room before she could hope to get more clarification from him. He certainly would not remain if she asked.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dispassionate observation followed Natasa's every movement as she went to the collection of arcane paraphernalia that lay meticulously arranged across the nearby table. Stepping back to allow his apprentice space. She lacked the will to command magic, that much was immediately evident in his study. A common mistake of those forced into magic, rather than pursuing it of their own volition. Even now she went through the motions, the things taught by her Familiar, but like her Familiar she lacked the correct mental fortification to "}, "post-86418": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1541219061000", "message": "Divyna quickly approached her mistress, giving a curtsy. \"I am pleased to see that you have succeeded under my tutelage, Lady Volkh. Shall we prepare for the ball together? I'm sure you will look absolutely splendid.\" the golem offered, extending a hand as if she had no idea why Natasa might be hesitant to accept it. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Divyna quickly approached her mistress, giving a curtsy. "}, "post-86509": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1541385144000", "message": "Natasa almost hissed at Volkh when he took her chin between his fingers. He was unnecessarily touchy! She decided she much preferred it when he was cold and distant and... not close to her at all!As she watched him turn heel, she rubbed her chin, trying to get rid of the chill he left on her skin. Vile! Disgusting! Wretched creature!The heat emanating from her body from her anger disappeared when Divyna approached her. She quirked a brow. Putting aside her temper, she focused on what had actually been said. What was he talking about?\"A ball? The Empress' Ball? The Empress? Really? How come we can go? Does m'Lord know her?\"Was he really that important? He was a Lord, sure, but was she allowing any old lord to her event? Natasa was left gaping at the vampire's back before turning to Divyna.\"Getting ready together? What... what will I be wearing?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa almost hissed at Volkh when he took her chin between his fingers. He was unnecessarily touchy! She decided she much preferred it when he was cold and distant and... not close to her at all!"}, "post-86520": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1541391048000", "message": "\"To my knowledge, Lord Volkh does not know the Empress. However, I spent many years without news, Lady Volkh. There is the possibility that the situation as I know it has changed.\" the doll mused, although its movements did little to emphasis her supposedly thoughtful nature. She stared at Natasa until the younger woman approached before turning to lead the way. \"Lord Volkh made very clear the specifications of your garb, and measured you appropriately while unconscious. In the time while you slept I have sewn it in preparation. I do so hope you'll like it.\" the lack of inflection made it difficult to tell exactly what the golem felt about the subject. Or, indeed, whether she felt anything at all. Approaching a room that had, until now, been untouched, she swung the door inwards, revealing a parlor, well-stocked with sewing equipment. The decor was surprisingly sprightly, even chic for its time. Pastel pinks lined the walls and a few cushions. In the center a mannequin stood, a dress overflowing across the ground in cascades of silk and lace. Stepping aside Divyna looked to Natasa, gesturing with a hand. \"Lord Volkh made a few improvements.\" she addressed, approaching it to point out a few runes, slight discolors in the fabric nearly invisible to those not looking. \"Charms of defense.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"To my knowledge, Lord Volkh does not know the Empress. However, I spent many years without news, Lady Volkh. There is the possibility that the situation as I know it has changed.\" the doll mused, although its movements did little to emphasis her supposedly thoughtful nature. She stared at Natasa until the younger woman approached before turning to lead the way. "}, "post-86525": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1541394548000", "message": "Natasa wasn't sure how to react. At first, her jaw just kept stretching from hearing about Volkh taking advantage of her unconscious body. Her hands crossed over her chest insecurely. \"He... he didn't do anything else, did he?\"She knew he had taken care of her blood-and-vomit-soaked clothes and bandaged her, but measuring her? Ohh, she could feel the mortal wound burning, feeding on her outrage! Yet no sooner did the flame of anger come, was her mind taken from it. She was flooded in a room filled with colors that she had only seen in the sky at dawn. Her eyes were like saucers they were so wide. They rolled over the tapestries on the wall, the plush pillows, and finally... the dress.The poor, cursed peasant girl would have never thought it was hers until Divyna told her it was so. She didn't even pay attention to the runes that her aide was describing as she reached her hands out to touch the fabric, flinching because it was so light she felt it would just fall apart. She couldn't decide if she was looking at a stream of water or a veil of clouds, as its silvery appearance had a way of capturing the light to make it dance. When she lifted the hem, the skirt took its time to float down, as though time itself had slowed to watch it fall. And then... there was the bodice. Oh! What a delight, this cloth that was shaped like a heart from the front and came together using ribbons at the back, laced with gems, of all things!After the height of her bedazzlement, Natasa looked up at Divyna, confused. \u201cBut\u2026 but Divyna, it\u2019s not finished. It\u2026 it doesn\u2019t have sleeves. How does it stay on?\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa wasn't sure how to react. At first, her jaw just kept stretching from hearing about Volkh taking advantage of her unconscious body. Her hands crossed over her chest insecurely. \"He... he didn't do anything "}, "post-86526": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1541395683000", "message": "When Natasa expressed her confusion in the attire, Divyna stared at her in silence for a moment, unmoving. Then, it made a half turn, gesturing to the bodice of the dress. \"Sleeves are unnecessary in this design.\" it explained patiently. \"Please dress into the undergarments provided and I will aid you in donning it.\" once Natasa had dressed (or undressed) to the appropriate level, Divyna directed her towards the back of the dress. Unlaced, the golem opened it, ushering her ward into it's deceptively brutal clutches as she began to expertly thread the corset behind her. \"Take a few breaths and then pull in your stomach as much as you can.\" the doll directed. Then, once the orders were followed, she pulled. Deceptively strong, the yank tightened the bodice dramatically, constricting across Natasa's ribs like a ravenous beast, trying to crush the life from her breast. \"If you could breathe in even further. We're not quite there yet.\" Divyna told her and, as if it weren't already tight enough she began to pull once again.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Natasa expressed her confusion in the attire, Divyna stared at her in silence for a moment, unmoving. Then, it made a half turn, gesturing to the bodice of the dress. "}, "post-86529": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1541398559000", "message": "Once Divyna had the bodice on her, the girl had to brace with her hands flat against the wall, teeth grit so hard she could almost hear them crack. As she cried out, little beads of spit fell onto the floor.Why, oh, why was this gorgeous thing such torture? Was this Volkh's way of punishing her? Had she done something wrong? No! It must be that he took pleasure in her pain. Yes! Of course! He was a vampire, after all! Growling, she swore for the hundredth time that she would one day lop his head from his shoulders!\"I... can't... breathe in anymore!\" she wailed. For every tug, breath was drawn from her, as was life. Or so she felt. \"Divyna you're killing me!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Once Divyna had the bodice on her, the girl had to brace with her hands flat against the wall, teeth grit so hard she could almost hear them crack. As she cried out, little beads of spit fell onto the floor."}, "post-86534": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1541399997000", "message": "\"Then it is perfect.\" Divyna declared, finally allowing her to straighten up as she tied off the ribbon. \"Lady Volkh, that the corset you are wearing is quite in fashion. Very stylish, and will be similar to what everyone at the court will be wearing.\" the she gave a short bow, and the words almost hung cheekily in the air: So stop being a baby about it!Once satisfied with the snugness of the bodice, Divyna took some time to circle Natasa, preening and smoothing out creases or anything else she found unsatisfactory. At last she stood before her master again with almost a sense of pride shared between them. It was indeed the first time the young woman looked like the master between them.\u00a0\"We must meet Lord Volkh in the portal room.\" she said at last, opening the door for her lady before leading the way. After a few particularly confusing turns, she stopped in the mid-hallway, stepping back to assume her place behind Natasa.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Then it is perfect.\" Divyna declared, finally allowing her to straighten up as she tied off the ribbon. \"Lady Volkh, that the corset you are wearing is quite in fashion. Very stylish, and will be similar to what everyone at the court will be wearing.\" the she gave a short bow, and the words almost hung cheekily in the air: "}, "post-86536": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1541400628000", "message": "Before the two figure emerged from the darkness beyond. Volkh stood before her, resplendent in finery. With dark, rich colors, they looked freshly tailored, and with them, his enchanted mantle. The style matched her own dress, but the color was not similar in the least. Black with gold trimming, carefully embroidered with runes similar to her own. \"I see Divyna finished the dress with impressive alacrity.\" the Lord mused, approaching Natasa once again. In better view, crimson eyes stared down at her, no longer the black, soulless ones she had know doubt come to attribute to him. \"That is not the only impressive feat worth mentioning. You look ravishing.\" With that he turned, the doors before them swinging open. \"Say goodbye to the doll, for now. I shall be ample protection.\" he warned. Before them the forgotten room held three monoliths, black as pitch and etched with ancient runes, positioned in a triangle around a series of runes drawn upon the floor. \"Stride forward with me.\" he insisted, offering her an elbow.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Before the two figure emerged from the darkness beyond. Volkh stood before her, resplendent in finery. With dark, rich colors, they looked freshly tailored, and with them, his enchanted mantle. The style matched her own dress, but the color was not similar in the least. Black with gold trimming, carefully embroidered with runes similar to her own. "}, "post-86552": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1541441485000", "message": "Natasa wiped her mouth as Divyna sized her up, taking care not to disturb the rouge she had applied right before putting on the dress. Divyna had done quite a bit of work on her in the time they'd spent in the room. Her hair was braided over her horns and adorned with a number of feathery ornaments that matched the color of her dress and masked the brown strands that otherwise stuck out like a sore thumb.Once the pain ebbed away, she took a moment to look down and admire the dress. She swayed back and forth just to watch it move. She had never seen anything so beautiful in her life!She looked up to Divyna and smiled right back. For a moment, she couldn't figure out if she was in a nightmare or a dream.Before she could speak the girl was swept up and moved through the castle. She struggled with her shoes, as they had a slight heel in them, causing her to trip here and there, but she adjusted on her way to Volkh.The first thing she paid attention to was the vampire. She figured this would always be the case, especially under the influence of his aura. Even without it, the monster really knew how to fill up an entire room. His clothing was as lavish as her own, though quite a bit more conservative, as was appropriate.When he complimented her, a flood of conflicting emotions tied up her insides more than the bodice did earlier. She simply said nothing this time and did what he said, slipping a dainty hand around his arm. After all, she really did want to see other people. Divyna was showing some personality now, something somewhat human... but it wasn't enough! She was going to go mad in this castle with only these two as company!", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa wiped her mouth as Divyna sized her up, taking care not to disturb the rouge she had applied right before putting on the dress. Divyna had done quite a bit of work on her in the time they'd spent in the room. Her hair was braided over her horns and adorned with a number of feathery ornaments that matched the color of her dress and masked the brown strands that otherwise stuck out like a sore thumb."}, "post-89816": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1556076474000", "message": "Natasa's desire for interaction, was rivaled only by her Lord's desire for solitude. It had been nearly a century since he was out among mortals for anything more than a quick bite and he found his lengthy solitude had a more meaningful impact than he had calculated. Together, the two had stepped in unison into the trio of obelisks which had brought them so gracefully to the ball. Yet, as opposed to the fanciful feasts and daring dancers, nitid nobles or handsome heroes they were greeted with nothing but smothering shadows. They stood once more within the chamber of teleportation, the unvarnished, chokingly stifled room so oppressive compared to the fire and beauty of gowns and open air. Once again they were alone, but for each other. Lord Volkh, his hand over hers, exiting as they had once entered what felt like months ago. Her one night of freedom, it seemed, was over. The heroes she met gone to the harshness of distance. Yet, more than anything, was the quiet. No one made merry here in Castle Volkh. No glasses clinked, no music played. There was only the roaring silence. A small rustle of movement seemed an avalanche of silks, as Divyna, stood in the very place they had left her bowed. \"Lord and Lady Volkh have returned.\" she announced, as if to other servants. There were none. The vampire gave a nod, releasing Natasa's hand as he turned slightly to observe her. \"I trust you enjoyed yourself?\" he asked, his voice like marble. It was difficult to tell if he were at all moved by their trip to the outside. His face, as ever, was unreadable. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa's desire for interaction, was rivaled only by her Lord's desire for solitude. It had been nearly a century since he was out among mortals for anything more than a quick bite and he found his lengthy solitude had a more meaningful impact than he had calculated. Together, the two had stepped in unison into the trio of obelisks which had brought them so gracefully to the ball. Yet, as opposed to the fanciful feasts and daring dancers, nitid nobles or handsome heroes they were greeted with nothing but smothering shadows. They stood once more within the chamber of teleportation, the unvarnished, chokingly stifled room so oppressive compared to the fire and beauty of gowns and open air. Once again they were alone, but for each other. "}, "post-89972": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1557095886000", "message": "Aside from her thundering heart, Natasa was quiet. For a while, the commotion of the party, the dancing, the drinking, the laughing, was a healthy distraction from the darkness, the suffering, the anger.And that insufferable, unignorable itch.When she had bumped into that girl, the one with her face, her thoughts were concentrated on the mystery at hand, but when Volkh's voice reached her ears in the emptiness of the castle, it was like falling into quicksand: she could only watch herself being swallowed by his curse.She gave no attention to Divyna. She even grabbed for his sleeve as he let her hand go. Turning to face him, she raised her chin up, eyes intent, edges of her lips turned down.\"When we first met you said I was yours,\" she said, brow gently wrinkling. \"The deal was that you would be drinking from me, was it not? Yet to my knowledge, you haven't even tried once. I believe I've had more of your blood than you have had of mine.\" Her eyes narrowed, a desperate simper turned into a pout. \"Why?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Aside from her thundering heart, Natasa was quiet. For a while, the commotion of the party, the dancing, the drinking, the laughing, was a healthy distraction from the darkness, the suffering, the anger."}, "post-89986": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1557100607000", "message": "Volkh was unaccustomed to her forwardness. Perhaps, he considered, the fresh air had reignited some vitality she had once had. Or perhaps her interaction with her doppelganger had given her a glimpse to what she might become. Yet here now she asked a piercing, expectant question. Eyeing her with quiet scrutiny, he suddenly shifted, his body closer to hers, cloak billowing towards her, around her, as if it were a pair of mighty wings that threatened to envelop the young woman. Yet, his voice was placid, as bereft as emotion as ever, save his bout of fury upon their initial meeting. \"To partake in you is tempting.\" he confessed coldly, and for a moment it seemed he may do just that. A cold hand brushed against her cheek, the backs of his fingers grazing lightly over the skin, as if checking a child for a fever. \"Yet I consider obstacles. It would be a dangerous test, enacted through lust rather than my scientific process. I have nothing but hypothesis for how such an act would affect your curse. Nor do I know what effect your own curse would have upon the disease within me. Such an act could be catastrophic.\" his voice was barely a whisper, clearly heard, and yet his crimson eyes had begun to fade once again to a feral black. The eyes of a predator.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Volkh was unaccustomed to her forwardness. Perhaps, he considered, the fresh air had reignited some vitality she had once had. Or perhaps her interaction with her doppelganger had given her a glimpse to what she might become. Yet here now she asked a piercing, expectant question. Eyeing her with quiet scrutiny, he suddenly shifted, his body closer to hers, cloak billowing towards her, around her, as if it were a pair of mighty wings that threatened to envelop the young woman. Yet, his voice was placid, as bereft as emotion as ever, save his bout of fury upon their initial meeting. "}, "post-90078": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1557374321000", "message": "There was a twinge of fear deep in Natasa's heart, but it was overshadowed by Volkh's charm. As his fingers slid across her skin she took a breath, her body shuddering. Her hand rose to grasp his, the rush of her blood pulsing through her palm. The shadow began to swallow her, and she invited it.\"Would it be so bad?\" she asked, expression longing, begging for his teeth. \"Would it be worse than waiting? Because that feels like it's going to kill me.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There was a twinge of fear deep in Natasa's heart, but it was overshadowed by Volkh's charm. As his fingers slid across her skin she took a breath, her body shuddering. Her hand rose to grasp his, the rush of her blood pulsing through her palm. The shadow began to swallow her, and she invited it."}, "post-90102": {"user": "Lord Mykola Volkh", "user_num": 2759, "timestamp": "1557459014000", "message": "Together here in the darkness, it seemed as if all of time hinged on this one moment. A million pathways opened, an infinity of \"what-ifs\" that spread through the mind like a flash fire. A hand, seizing her waist, pulled her to him, her petite frame eclipsed by his own and she was lost in the billowing folds of his cape. How long had it been since this ember burnt in his long-still breast? Desire. Not a desire for his scientific progress, nor for the mere blood in her veins which he could feel even know, through the warmth of her palm. All these things seemed so trite here, mere afterthoughts compared to the copious need he had to sink those waiting fangs into the pliant flesh of her slender throat and make her truly his own. She would be his own, and no heroic whelp or aspiring lordling could ever hope to sway her from him. He would have her in the palm of his hand, control her from such an intimate level she would not dare abandon what they had created here between them.\u00a0It was that thought alone that stilled him. That was not him. It was a part of him now, yes, but this urge beyond urges was borne of that disease- the curse -that flowed through him. It controlled him as deftly as he himself controlled her. Yet the prickling heat danced across his skin, a sensation lost for so long rekindling that spark within to a flame. Was it so wrong, she had asked? If he himself identified it as a part of himself was there any real point in separating it in this matter any more than he did in any other? His thoughts were shaken from him at the feel of a firm hand upon his chest. He stared blankly for a moment, even as he released his grip on Natasa and the doll drew her back, hand still upon his chest as she disentangled the two.\u00a0For a moment Volkh's eyes flashed, and it seemed as if he may dash the doll to pieces for its impudence, but immediately the thought was dispelled. His cloak drifted to the ground, suddenly bereft of whatever curious power which had stirred it to action. Then, stepping back he allowed the distance between them to pass, and the flame within sputtered into a cold darkness once more.\u00a0\"We will continue your studies presently.\" he announced distantly. \"For now, allow the doll to escort you to your room. You will stay there for the remainder of the night.\" Turning on his heel, the vampire left no real time to complain, disappearing into nothingness and leaving the two alone.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Together here in the darkness, it seemed as if all of time hinged on this one moment. A million pathways opened, an infinity of \"what-ifs\" that spread through the mind like a flash fire. A hand, seizing her waist, pulled her to him, her petite frame eclipsed by his own and she was lost in the billowing folds of his cape. How long had it been since this ember burnt in his long-still breast? "}, "post-90206": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1557758320000", "message": "As she was drawn close the girl closed her eyes, the relief of a long-awaited moment nearly upon her. She waited with bated breath for the sting of his teeth...But it did not come.Eyes fluttering open, she instead saw herself retreating from the vampire. She turned her head to glance at Divyna, her familiar, and began to squirm. \"No!\" she protested, kicking her feet beneath her gown. Lifting her head, she attempted to plead to her Lord for help, to ask why he was refusing her, but he was already gone. She planted her hands on the doll's arm and grunted with frustration. Her cheeks became wet with tears as she bawled, not out of sadness, but anger. The flame that spewed from her chest burst, chipping further at her skin to extend the cracks up her neck. Her nails curled into Divyna's arm as claws now, her gnashing teeth becoming fangs. Her horns pulled at her hair as they emerged further, tearing the precious braids that her maid had threaded with her fingers so delicately just hours before.The tantrum lasted only seconds before the effort drained the girl, who let herself droop, raggedy and defeated. Her breathing labored, her body was hot as embers, but she was somewhat human once more.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As she was drawn close the girl closed her eyes, the relief of a long-awaited moment nearly upon her. She waited with bated breath for the sting of his teeth..."}, "post-90254": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1557951914000", "message": "Divyna's expression did not, could not, change. Silently she stared at her mistress' enraged figure, the claws with which she was grasp leaving ragged grooves and torn silk across the doll's forearm and yet only as this flash of rage had simmered into despondency did she release her grasp. \"Come, Lady Volkh, let us retire to your room.\" she suggested gently. \"I'm afraid Lord Volkh's aura has taken its toll. With rest, you are sure to recover.\" Taking the girl's wrist once again, she placed her elbow, as if leading an elderly, or infirm relative to bed.The walk through the hallways was, as always, silent. Divyna spoke rarely, and with great care, but rarely did she do so out in the corridors. In fact, despite Volkh's numerous stone guardians and servants, Natasa would find she had never passed one errantly in the hallways. By the time the couple had found their way back to Natasa's room, however, the pervading effect Volkh emanated had largely dissipated from the girl's mind. The doll led the girl to her bed, allowing her to sit before stepping once again to the door and shutting it. \"Do you feel well, Lady Volkh?\" she asked quietly. \"Perhaps I may fetch you some water.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Divyna's expression did not, could not, change. Silently she stared at her mistress' enraged figure, the claws with which she was grasp leaving ragged grooves and torn silk across the doll's forearm and yet only as this flash of rage had simmered into despondency did she release her grasp. "}, "post-90388": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1558482097000", "message": "Natasa felt her body ache. She felt a fatigue that not only tolled on her body but weighed heavily on her mind. Still, she wished not to rest, nor to sulk. A flicker of a flame still ignited deep down in her heart, willing her to fight. If only she had not burned through all the fuel left to do it. As she felt Volkh\u2019s presence melt away, however, the flame flickered out, replaced by something else entirely.As a hand came to her chest, her expression soured. She brought her knees up to her ribs. Attempting to speak, Natasa achieved little more than a croak. The girl buried her face in the folds of her dress, eyes skimming the tiny embedded gems. What precious little beads of wonder and hope had been woven into the fabric, blinding her from the ugliness around her. She picked at them, ignoring Divyna\u2019s question as she tried to lift the gems from their threaded constraints and flick them onto the floor.Yet, that just wasn\u2019t enough. She scratched at where her body met the cloth, sharp nails etching away at pale skin until it became red. Before she could break skin she squirmed, pressing her back to the back as she grabbed the bodice and pulled and pulled until her meager strength left her arms. Natasa bit her lips in an attempt to hold back the tears that manifested at the corners of her eyes. She took deep breaths that quickly became shallow and harsh until she rolled around onto her stomach and grunted miserably into the sheets:\u201cI don\u2019t want to wear this damned thing anymore! Get it off. Get it off!\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Natasa felt her body ache. She felt a fatigue that not only tolled on her body but weighed heavily on her mind. Still, she wished not to rest, nor to sulk. A flicker of a flame still ignited deep down in her heart, willing her to fight. If only she had not burned through all the fuel left to do it. As she felt Volkh\u2019s presence melt away, however, the flame flickered out, replaced by something else entirely."}, "post-90481": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1558723712000", "message": "As Natasa began her struggled, Divyna watched with quiet contemplation until she cast herself onto her stomach. Then, approaching wordlessly her dexterous fingers worked over the lace backing. Freeing her from the dress initially, she then pulled away the boning of the bodice and set it gently aside despite her master's agitation. Then, turning, she sat on the bed next to the slender figure. \"You feel agitated.\" It was a statement, not a question. An obvious statement, although not one it had seemed she'd have picked up earlier. Before the doll seemed to act as rationally as possible, regardless of Natasa's frustration at a particularly difficult area of her studies or dispondence of dwelling in such darkness. \"You are unhappy.\" she added, although perhaps more softly this time.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Natasa began her struggled, Divyna watched with quiet contemplation until she cast herself onto her stomach. Then, approaching wordlessly her dexterous fingers worked over the lace backing. Freeing her from the dress initially, she then pulled away the boning of the bodice and set it gently aside despite her master's agitation. Then, turning, she sat on the bed next to the slender figure. "}, "post-90610": {"user": "Natasa Waltine", "user_num": 2760, "timestamp": "1558988257000", "message": "Grabbing onto the sheets, Natasa refused to look at Divyna, deciding to stew on her resentment. She curled up, pressing her forehead to her knees, then sat still for a moment, her sobs the only noise to pierce the suppressive silence around them. After a few long minutes, after the sobs diminished, she rose her head up to look at Divyna.She had been by her side since that painful day that she became her familiar. At first, Natasa only saw her as one of Volkh's pawns, but that night she had put herself between them and oh, the anger that she saw in his eyes, evident even in her haze. Such an action was performed against his will, done only for her own sake. Looking at her, she wondered if Divyna would do something like that again.\"... he's awful,\" she whispered, rolling over so that they could speak face to face. \"I hate him every moment he's away and then he gets close to me. I hate that stupid curse and the way he looks at me when I go to him because of it!\" She worked herself up again, flame flaring in the spike of emotion. \"I hate that I'm so angry all the time. It never really goes away even when I'm scared. I don't... I don't think I was always like this.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Grabbing onto the sheets, Natasa refused to look at Divyna, deciding to stew on her resentment. She curled up, pressing her forehead to her knees, then sat still for a moment, her sobs the only noise to pierce the suppressive silence around them. After a few long minutes, after the sobs diminished, she rose her head up to look at Divyna."}, "post-91591": {"user": "Divyna", "user_num": 2884, "timestamp": "1561162898000", "message": "Quietly the doll listened to Natasa's words, almost pleading. She wanted answers, not platitudes. But no answers came. Watching Natasa as she spoke, it was impossible to tell by her featureless face what she might feel or think about the girl's fears. Yet, after a moment she reached down, placing a strange, multifaceted hand onto the young woman's. \"I can feel your anger.\" the words were quiet, as if they might carry their mutual secret to the ears of the vampire. \"What were you like before?\" Stirred by her question she rose, going to the door and turning the key in the lock, assuring them some semblance of privacy. Of course, Lord Volkh could easily just manifest in the room with or without any sort of lock but the act in and of itself set a definite message. Then, drawing her chair to the bedside she, in a flurry of skirts took a seat. \"As part of our Pact, I will tell you mine in reparation.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Quietly the doll listened to Natasa's words, almost pleading. She wanted answers, not platitudes. But no answers came. Watching Natasa as she spoke, it was impossible to tell by her featureless face what she might feel or think about the girl's fears. Yet, after a moment she reached down, placing a strange, multifaceted hand onto the young woman's. "}}